<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88518-0091 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-18-88.f2.A1090</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">Biweekly Notice; Applications and Amendments to Operating LicensesInvolving No Significant Hazards Considerations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>Pursuant to Public Law (P.L.) 97-415, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission(the Commission) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. P.L. 97-415revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, orproposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act.This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediatelyeffective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination bythe Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration,notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearingfrom any person. This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposedto be issued from April 23, 1988 through May 6, 1988. The last biweeklynotice was published on May 4, 1988 (53 FR 15905). <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATINGLICENSE AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION DETERMINATIONAND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING </ITAG>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendmentrequests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission'sregulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facilityin accordance with the proposed amendments would not (1) involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for eachamendment request is shown below. The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination.Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of thisnotice will be considered in making any final determination. The Commissionwill not normally make a final determination unless it receives a requestfor a hearing. Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Rules and Procedures Branch,Division of Rules and Records, Office of Administration and Resource Management,U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and should citethe publication date and page number of this <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Written comments may also be deliveredto Room 4000, Maryland National Bank Building, 7735 Old Georgetown Road,Bethesda, Maryland from 8:15 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Copies of written commentsreceived may be examined at the NRC Public Document Room, 1717 H Street,NW., Washington, DC. The filing of requests for hearing and petitions forleave to intervene is discussed below. By June 17, 1988, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respectto issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating licenseand any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and whowishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a writtenpetition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and petitions forleave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rulesof Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. If arequest for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by theabove date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designatedby the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition and the Secretaryor the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a noticeof hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding,and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determinationon the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determinationwill serve to decide when the hearing is held. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significanthazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and makeit immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Anyhearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment. If the final determination is that the amendment involves a significanthazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuanceof any amendment. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expirationof the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change duringthe notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result,for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission mayissue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day noticeperiod, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involvesno significant hazards consideration. The final determination will considerall public and State comments received before action is taken. Should theCommission take this action, it will publish a notice of issuance and providefor opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects thatthe need to take this action will occur very infrequently. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW.,Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during thelast ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitionerpromptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to WesternUnion at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700). The Western Unionoperator should be given Datagram Identification Number 3737 and the followingmessage addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or thepresiding Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or requestshould be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application foramendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission'sPublic Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the localpublic document room for the particular facility involved. <ITAG tagnum="84">Baltimore Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-317 and 50-318,Calvert Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Calvert County,Maryland </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>July 10, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The July 10, 1987 BGandamp;E applicationproposed adding Technical Specification (TS) operability and reportingrequirements for the reactor vessel level monitoring system (RVLMS) tothe Units 1 and 2 TS 3/4.3.3.6, ``Post-Accident Instrumentation,'' andTS 6.9.2, ``Special Reports.'' <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>This change proposed for Units 1 and 2 to modify (1) TS 3/4.3.3.6,``Post-Accident Instrumentation,'' by changing the referenced TS Tables3.3-10, ``Post-Accident Monitoring Instrumentation Surveillance Requirements,''and 4.3-10, ``Post-Accident Monitoring Instrumentation Surveillance Requirements,''and (2) TS 6.9.2, ``Special Reports,'' to incorporate operability and reportingrequirements for RVLMS. The proposed TS correspond, with two exceptions,to the generic Combustion Engineering (CE) RVLMS TS that were found acceptableby the NRC staff in the October 28, 1986 NRC letter from D. M. Crutchfieldto R. W. Wells of the CE Owners' Group. The exceptions proposed by BGandamp;E,concerning actions required when no RVLMS channels are operable, were:1. to modify Action 35.1 of TS Table 3.3-10 to initiate an alternativemethod of monitoring for core and reactor coolant system voiding ratherthan for monitoring reactor vessel inventory, and 2. to change the generic requirement that the RVLMS system be restoredto operability at the next scheduled refueling outage (Table 3.3-10 requiresa minimum of 2 RVLMS channels to be operable) to the proposed requirementthat at least one RVLMS channel be restored to operability at the nextscheduled refueling outage. On March 6, 1986, the NRC published guidance in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(51 FR 7751) concerning examples of amendmentsthat are not likely to involve a significant hazards consideration. This change is consistent with one of the different examples provided:``(ii) A change that constitutes an additional limitation, restriction,or control not presently included in the Technical Specifications, e.g.,a more stringent surveillance requirement.'' This proposed change wouldimpose surveillance requirements where none previously existed. Consequently,the NRC staff proposes to determine that this proposed change which addsRVLMS surveillance and reporting requirements to the TS, involves no significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Calvert County Library, PrinceFrederick, Maryland. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Jay E. Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, North Carolina Eastern MunicipalPower Agency, Docket No. 50-400, Shearon Harris Nuclear Power Plant (SHNPP),Unit 1, Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Dates of amendment request: </T3>February 1, February 8, and April13, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment containsfive (5) groups of Technical Specification changes that are required tosupport Shearon Harris Cycle 2 operation. These groups are entitled: (1)D-Bank Reconfiguration; (2) F<T2>Q</T2>T Increase From 2.28 to 2.32 - RAOC/Base Load Operation and F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance; (3) Increased F-Delta-H Multiplier; (4) borondilution/sliding shutdown margin; and (5) Miscellaneous. In addition, aBases change involving Rod Bow Penalty has been made. Group 1 relates to those changes arising from the licensee's change froma four rod Control Bank-D currently used, to a more standard eight rodControl Bank-D configuration. The proposed amendment would revise TS Figure3.1-1, Rod Group Insertion Limits Versus Thermal Power Three Loop Operation.In addition, TS Figure 3.1-1 has been administratively renumbered to Figure3.1-2 in conjunction with a new Figure 3.1-1 proposed in Group 4 below.Group 2 changes involve: (1) increasing the Heat Flux Hot Channel Factor,F<T2>Q</T2>T, in Technical Specification 3.2.2; (2) revising the Local AxialPenalty Function, K(z), in Technical Specification Figure 3.2-2; (3) replacingthe existing Constant Axial Offset Control (CAOC) procedures of TechnicalSpecification Section 3/4.2.1 with a combined Relaxed Axial Offset Control(RAOC)/Base Load operating strategy; (4) replacing the existing F<T2>xy</T2> surveillance of Technical Specification 4.2.2.1 with a F<T2>Q</T2>T surveillance; (5) revising f(delta-I) reset function in TechnicalSpecification Table 2.2.-1; and (6) revising Technical Specification 6.9.1.6,which delineates the content and schedule requirements of the Radial PeakingFactor Limit Report. Group 3 would revise the equation used to determine F-Delta-H, the NuclearEnthalpy Rise Hot Channel Factor, presented in Technical Specification3.2.3.b. The existing 0.2 multiplier has been increased to 0.3. This multiplieracts to increase the allowable F-Delta-H at reduced power levels. In addition,the core limit curves presented in Technical Specification Figure 2.1-1have been revised. These curves, which are based on F-Delta-H, show theloci of points of thermal power, Reactor Coolant System pressure and averagetemperature for which the minimum Departure from Nucleate Boiling Ratio(DNBR) is no less than 1.30. Group 4 modifies the shutdown margin requirements of Technical SpecificationSection 3/4.1.1. The current Technical Specifications require a fixed valuefor shutdown margin for a given mode of operation. The proposed amendmentmaintains the current fixed shutdown margin requirement for Modes 1, 2,and 6 while implementing a variable shutdown margin requirement as a functionof reactor coolant system (RCS) boron concentration for Modes 3, 4 and5. Due to the higher shutdown margin required at the beginning of SHNPPCycle 2 for Mode 5, the minimum fluid volume requirements for the boricacid tank and the refueling water storage tank specified in Technical Specifications3.1.2.5 and 3.1.2.6 have been increased to provide sufficient inventoryto go from Mode 1 to Mode 5. The addition of a new figure in the TechnicalSpecifications necessitates administrative changes affecting the designationof the Rod Group Insertion Limits versus Thermal Power Figure and associatedreferences, the details are discussed in the ``D-Bank reconfiguration -Control Rod Insertion Limits'' Technical Specification change. Group 5 would revise: (1) the Technical Specification Table 4.3-1 SurveillanceRequirements for the Excore Power Range Monitors; and (2) the descriptionof Fuel Assemblies located in Technical Specification 5.3.1. Currently,Technical Specification Table 4.3-1 requires that a single-point comparisonof INCORE/EXCORE Axial Flux Difference (AFD) be performed monthly and anINCORE/EXCORE calibration be performed quarterly. The proposed change toTable 4.3-1 revises these surveillances to once per 31 Effective Full PowerDays (EFPD) and once per 92 EFPD, respectively. The proposed change to the fuel assembly description of Technical Specification5.3.1 allows for repair of fuel assemblies by substitution of filler rodsor vacancies for damaged fuel rods. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether or not a no significant hazards consideration exists. A proposedamendment to an operating license for a facility involves no significanthazards consideration if operation of the facility in accordance with theproposed amendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated, or (2)create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed amendment againstthe standards in 10 CFR 50.92 and has determined: <T3>Group 1 </T3> The change does not involve a significant hazards consideration for thefollowing reasons: 1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Currently,Control Bank D consists of four Rod Cluster Control Assemblies (RCCAs)located near the core periphery. During the upcoming SHNPP refueling outage,the four RCCAs located near the core center which currently comprise ShutdownBank D will be combined into Control Bank D and Shutdown Bank D will nolonger exist. The limits shown on the Rod Group Insertion Limits VersusThermal Power figure have been revised, using NRC approved methodologyfrom WCAP 9273-A, to establish new limits which ensure that with the eightrod Control Bank D configuration: (1) power distributions are maintainedwithin current limits; (2) the minimum shutdown margin for power operation(Modes 1 and 2) remains the same as that for SHNPP Cycle 1 operation; and(3) the potential effects of rod misalignment, including rod ejectionsand rod withdrawal, on associated accident analyses are limited as discussedherein. The addition of the four Shutdown Bank D rods to Control Bank D returnsSHNPP to an eight rod configuration as was approved in the SHNPP PSAR.The eight rod Control Bank D is the generic configuration for Westinghouse3-loop 17 x 17 design plants. The Commission has previously approved thiseight rod configuration at other facilities such as V. C. Summer, J. M.Farley Units 1 and 2, and Beaver Valley Units 1 and 2. This generic configurationprovides for a more uniform control of the core radial power distributionas control rods are inserted. Since the total integral worth of the revisedrod insertion limits is comparable to Cycle 1, the worth of any singleinserted RCCA at power is reduced because the worth is distributed overtwice the number of RCCAs. The probability and consequences of previouslyevaluated rod worth accidents at SHNPP will now be comparable to that atother Commission accepted eight rod Control Bank D plants. The addition of four rods to Control Bank D decreases the probability ofa rod ejection event at hot zero power because fewer rods are allowed inthe core by the proposed rod insertion limits at zero percent power thanare allowed by the existing Technical Specification. At full power theprobability of a rod ejection event is increased. Rod ejection is classifiedas an ANS Condition IV event, that is, an event which is not likely tooccur over the lifetime of the plant. This classification is applied torod ejection at other operating facilities with an eight rod Control BankD configuration. Since the eight rod Control Bank D configuration is ageneric design for 3-loop 17 x 17 Westinghouse plants, the Commission haspreviously licensed other facilities with this same configuration, andthe rod ejection event remains an ANS Condition IV event, CPandamp;L hasdetermined that the increase in the probability of a rod ejection eventat full power is not significant. The Control Bank D modification does not affect the scram functions ofthe affected RCCAs. The acceptable scram times for these rods are not differentfrom those currently established. The current assumptions used in the SHNPPFSAR Chapter 15 non-LOCA analyses for shutdown margin, trip reactivity,power distribution limits, ejected and dropped rod worths, post-ejectedrod peaking factors, integral rod worths, and differential rod worths werecompared with the expected Cycle 2 values for these parameters. It wasconfirmed that the Cycle 2 values are bounded by those assumed in the currentanalyses. Therefore, the consequences presented in the SHNPP FSAR for non-LOCAevents remain bounding given the new rod insertion limits. No credit is taken for control rods in the mitigation of a large breakLOCA in terms of peak clad temperature or long term cooling. As such, theproposed rod insertion limits have no impact on this analysis. The smallbreak LOCA analysis only models rod insertion in terms of a reactor tripand insertion of all banks. Since the revised rod insertion limits haveno impact on the insertion time or reactivity insertion, the proposed amendmentdoes not affect the consequences of a small break LOCA. Based on the above,CPandamp;L has determined that the proposed changes do not increase the consequencesof a previously evaluated accident. The revision to the designation for the Rod Group Insertion Limits VersusThermal Power figure and associated references is administrative in natureand, as such, can not increase the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. 2. As stated in Item 1, revising the limits in the Rod Group InsertionLimits Versus Thermal Power figure does not alter the method in which anysystem performs its intended safety function. The eight rod Control BankD configuration provides for a more uniform control of the core radialpower distribution as control rods are inserted. The total integral worthof the revised rod insertion limits is comparable to Cycle 1. Therefore,the proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident, including reactivity insertion or withdrawal accidents,from any accident previously evaluated. It should be noted that the eightrod Control Bank D configuration is identical to generic Westinghouse 3-loop17 x 17 plant designs and has previously been approved for use at V. C.Summer, J. M. Farley, Units 1 and 2, and Beaver Valley, Units 1 and 2.The NRC approved safety analyses for these plants do not address any newor different accidents from those currently analyzed for SHNPP. The revision to the designation for the Rod Group Insertion Limits VersusThermal Power figure and associated references is administrative in natureand, as such, can not create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. Currently, Control Bank D consists of four Rod ClusterControl Assemblies (RCCAs) located near the core periphery. During theupcoming SHNPP refueling outage, the four RCCAs located near the core centerwhich currently comprise Shutdown Bank D will be combined into ControlBank D and Shutdown Bank D will no longer exist. The limits shown on theRod Group Insertion Limits Versus Thermal Power figure have been revised,using NRC approved methodology from WCAP 9273-A, to establish new limitswhich ensure that with the eight rod Control Bank D configuration: (1)power distributions are maintained within current limits; (2) the minimumshutdown margin for power operation (Modes 1 and 2) remains the same asthat for SHNPP Cycle 1 operation; and (3) the potential effects of rodmisalignment, including rod ejections and rod withdrawal, on associatedaccident analyses are limited as discussed herein. The addition of the four Shutdown Bank D rods to Control Bank D returnsSHNPP to an eight rod configuration as was approved in the SHNPP PSAR.The eight rod Control Bank D is the generic configuration for Westinghouse3-loop 17 x 17 design plants. The Commission has previously approved thiseight rod configuration at other facilities such as V. C. Summer, J. M.Farley Units 1 and 2, and Beaver Valley Units 1 and 2. This generic configurationprovides for a more uniform control of the core radial power distributionas control rods are inserted. Since the total integral worth of the revisedrod insertion limits is comparable to Cycle 1, the worth of any singleinserted RCCA at power is reduced because the worth is distributed overtwice the number of RCCAs. The margin of safety at SHNPP will now be comparableto that at other Commission accepted eight rod Control Bank D plants. The Control Bank D modification does not affect the scram functions ofthe affected RCCAs. The acceptable scram times for these rods are not differentfrom those currently established. The current assumptions used in the SHNPPFSAR Chapter 15 non-LOCA analyses for shutdown margin, trip reactivity,power distribution limits, ejected and dropped rod post-ejected rod peakingfactors, integral rod worths, and differential rod worths were comparedwith the expected Cycle 2 values for these parameters. It was confirmedthat the Cycle 2 values are bounded by those assumed in the current analyses.Therefore, the conclusions presented in the SHNPP FSAR for non-LOCA eventsremain bounding given the new rod insertion limits. No credit is taken for control rods in the mitigation of a large breakLOCA In terms of peak clad temperature or long term cooling. As such, theproposed rod insertion limits have no impact on this analysis. The smallbreak LOCA analysis only models rod insertion in terms of a reactor tripand insertion of all banks. Since the revised rod insertion limits haveno impact on the insertion time or reactivity insertion, the proposed amendmentdoes not alter the current analysis for a small break LOCA. Based on the above reasoning, the Company has determined that there isno decrease in the margin of safety as a result of the proposed revisionto Control Bank D configuration. The revision to the designation for the Rod Group Insertion Limits VersusThermal Power figure and associated references is administrative in natureand, as such, can not reduce the margin of safety. <T3>Group 2 </T3> The changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration for thefollowing reasons: 1. The proposed increase in the F<T2>Q</T2>T limit and the associated change in the K(z) Local Axial Penaltyfunction do not increase the probability of an accident previously evaluatedbecause they do not affect any systems or equipment which are involvedin the initiation or mitigation of any previously analyzed accident and,as such, can not increase the probability of any accident previously evaluated.Operation with the proposed increase in the F<T2>Q</T2>T limit and the associated change in the K(z) Local Axial Penaltyfunction does not result in an increase in the radiological consequencesresulting from non-LOCA, overpower transients or small break LOCA events.The current SHNPP FSAR accident analyses for non-LOCA, overpower transientsand small break LOCA assume an F<T2>Q</T2>T limit of 2.32 or greater which bounds the proposed value of2.32. The large break LOCA event has been reanalyzed by Westinghouse. Thisanalysis was performed using the NRC approved BASH computer code. The BASHcomputer code provides a more realistic thermal/hydraulic simulation ofthe reactor core and the Reactor Coolant System during the reflood phaseof a LOCA thereby allowing the increase, F<T2>Q</T2>T limits. The NRC generically approved the Westinghouse BASHanalysis methods as WCAP-10266, Revision 2. The results of this reanalysisshow a decrease in the peak clad temperature, a slight increase in themaximum local metal-water reaction, and a comparable total core metal-waterreaction. The increase in the maximum local metal water reaction is from5.69% to 6.03%, which is insignificant when compared to the acceptancecriteria of 17% specified by Appendix K of 10 CFR 46. Based on the abovereasoning, CPandamp;L has determined that, the consequences of previouslyevaluated accidents are not significantly increased as a result of theproposed F<T2>Q</T2>T increase. The proposed amendment to: (1) replace the existing Constant Axial OffsetControl (CAOC) procedures with a combined Relaxed Axial Offset Control(RAOC)/Base Load operating strategy; (2) replace the F<T2>xy</T2> Surveillance of Technical Specification 4.2.2.1 with an F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance; and (3) revise the f(delta-I) reset function inTechnical Specification Table 2.2.1 does not increase the probability ofan accident previously evaluated because they do not affect any systemsor equipment which are involved in the initiation or mitigation of anypreviously analyzed accident. As such, these changes can not increase theprobability of any accidents previously evaluated. CPandamp;L has determined that the proposed amendment to: (1) replace theexisting Constant Axial Offset Control (CAOC) procedures with a combinedRelaxed Axial Offset Control (RAOC)/Base Load operating strategy; (2) replacethe F<T2>xy</T2> Surveillance of Technical Specification 4.2.2.1 with an F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance; and (3) revise the f(delta-I) reset function inTechnical Specification Table 2.2.1 does not increase the consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. RAOC is a method of using availablemargin by expanding the allowable axial flux difference (AFD) band, particularlyat reduced power levels. This enhances operational flexibility during routineoperational maneuvers. RAOC in combination with F<T2>Q</T2> surveillance provides an alternate method for assuring plantoperation remains below the F<T2>Q</T2>T limit specified in the Technical Specifications based upona measured parameter, neutron flux. The RAOC methodology has been approvedfor use by the NRC in WCAP-10216-P-A, Relaxation of Constant Axial OffsetControl, F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance Technical Specification, dated June 1983, and hasbeen approved for use at many operating facilities including McGuire Units1 and 2 and Catawba Units 1 and 2. Therefore, the consequences of previouslyevaluated accidents at SHNPP will now be comparable to that at other Commissionaccepted RAOC/F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance plants. The impact of operating under the proposed RAOC strategy is determinedby the affect the power shape envelope resulting from the newly definedAFD limits has on the consequences of the safety analyses presented inthe SHNPP FSAR. For non-LOCA events, the power shapes resulting from RAOChave been evaluated with respect to the limiting power shape used in theexisting analyses. It has been determined that the most limiting RAOC powershape results in a higher DNBR value than the reference power shape usedin the current FSAR analyses. Therefore, the consequences of the non-LOCAevents remain unchanged. In addition, power shapes which could occur atthe core limits are determined using the RAOC power shape envelope andare used to define the f(delta-I) reset function (a component of the OT-delta-Ttrip function) necessary to preserve a DNBR of 1.30 and to meet fuel cladstress requirements. The more restrictive f(delta-I) reset function, reflectedin the revised Technical Specification 2.2.1, preserves the DNBR and fuelclad stress limits used in the current analyses. Since the design limitsfor DNBR and clad stress remain the same as in the current analyses, themore restrictive Technical Specification limit placed on the f(delta-I)reset function provides assurance that the consequences presented in theSHNPP FSAR remain unchanged with the implementation of RAOC. For the LOCA analysis, the power shape envelope defined by the new RAOClimits has been determined to be bounded by the chopped cosine shape forLarge break LOCA and the top-skewed shape for the small break LOCA thatform the basis for the existing analysis. Therefore, the adoption of RAOCdoes not change the existing LOCA analyses presented in the SHNPP FSARand, as such, the consequences are not changed. The proposed changes provide the flexibility to use a Base Load mode ofoperation. The analysis to support this mode of operation is the standardWestinghouse CAOC methodology as approved by the NRC in WCAP-8385, TopicalReport - Power Distribution Control and Load Following Procedures, September1974 and is currently in use at SHNPP. The power shapes resulting fromoperating within the narrow AFD bands allowed under Base Load result ina more conservative DNBR value than those allowed under RAOC and, therefore,are bounded by the discussions mentioned previously. The proposed change replaces the existing F<T2>xy</T2> Surveillance with an F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance. F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance is an alternate method to F<T2>xy</T2> Surveillance that provides a more precise means of ensuringthat the core F<T2>Q</T2> remains within Technical Specification limits during routineoperational maneuvers and has been approved by the NRC for use with RAOC/BaseLoad operation in WCAP-10216-P-A, Relaxation of Constant Axial Offset Control,F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance Technical Specification, dated June 1983. The changeto F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance is only a change in the means by which measuredpower distributions are penalized in order to maintain actual power distributionswithin Technical Specification limits during operational maneuvers it doesnot represent a change to these limits. In addition, the existing TechnicalSpecifications allow operation to continue with F<T2>xy</T2> outside the Technical Specification limits provided an analysisof the affect on F<T2>Q</T2> is performed. The proposed F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance removes this flexibility by establishing fixedlimits on F<T2>Q</T2>. Based on the above reasoning, CPandamp;L has determined thatuse of F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance does not involve a significant increase in theconsequences of previously evaluated accidents. Use of F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance in combination with RAOC/Base Load has been approvedfor use at many operating facilities including McGuire Units 1 and 2 andCatawba Units 1 and 2; therefore, the consequences of previously analyzedaccidents at SHNPP will now be comparable to those at other Commissionaccepted F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance plants. The proposed change to Technical Specification 6.9.1.6 is administrativein nature and, as such, can not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. None of the proposedchanges introduce any new equipment or require any existing equipment orsystems to perform a different type of function than they are currentlydesigned to perform. In addition, F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance requirements in combination with RAOC/Base Loadoperations have been approved by the NRC for other operating units suchas McGuire Units 1 and 2 and Catawba Units 1 and 2. New or different accidentswere not created by the use of this methodology on those similar Westinghousereactors. 3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. The assumptions made in the existing accident analysesfor non-LOCA and small break LOCA events currently assume an F<T2>Q</T2>T of 2.32 or greater. Therefore, these analyses remain boundingwhen compared to the proposed increase in the F<T2>Q</T2>T limit to 2.32 and the associated change in the K(z) Local AxialPenalty Function. As such, there is no change to the margin of safety fornon-LOCA and small break LOCA events. A reanalysis of the Large break LOCAevent was performed by Westinghouse. This analysis was performed usingthe NRC approved BASH computer code. The BASH computer code provides amore realistic thermal/hydraulic simulation of the reactor core and theReactor Coolant System during the reflood phase of a LOCA, thereby allowingthe increased F<T2>Q</T2>T limits. The NRC generically approved the Westinghouse BASHanalysis methods as WCAP-10266, Revision 2. The results of this reanalysisshow a decrease in the peak clad temperature, a slight increase in themaximum local metal-water reaction, and a comparable total core metal-waterreaction. The increase in the maximum local metal water reaction is from5.69% to 6.03%, which is insignificant when compared to the acceptancecriteria of 17% specified by Appendix K of 10 CFR 46. Based on the abovereasoning, CPandamp;L has determined that, the proposed change does not significantlydecrease the margin of safety. The proposed changes to: (1) replace the existing Constant Axial OffsetControl (CAOC) procedures with a combined Relaxed Axial Offset Control(RAOC)/Base Load operating strategy; (2) replace the F<T2>xy</T2> Surveillance of Technical Specification 4.2.2.1 with an F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance; and (3) revise the f(delta-I) reset function inTechnical Specification Table 2.2.1 do not involve a significant reductionin the margin of safety. The impact of operating under the proposed RAOC strategy is determinedby the affect the power shape envelope resulting from the newly definedAFD Limits has on the consequences of the safety analyses presented inthe SHNPP FSAR. For non-LOCA events, the power shapes resulting from RAOChave been evaluated with respect to the limiting power shape used in theexisting analyses. It has been determined that the most limiting RAOC powershape results in a higher DNBR value than the reference power shape usedin the current FSAR analyses. Therefore, there is no change in the marginof safety. In addition, power shapes which could occur at the core limitsare determined using the RAOC power shape envelope and are used to definethe f(delta-I) reset function (a component of the OT-delta-T trip function)necessary to preserve a DNBR Of 1.30 and to meet fuel clad stress requirements.The more restrictive f(delta-I) reset function, reflected in the revisedTechnical Specification 2.2.1, preserves the DNBR and fuel clad stresslimits used in the current analyses. Standard Westinghouse methodologydefines the f(delta-I) reset function by defining which RAOC power shapeswill meet a DNBR of 1.30 and the limit on fuel clad stress. Those shapeswhich would cause a violation of these limits are prevented from occurringby making the Technical Specification f(delta-I) reset function more restrictive.In this manner, the margin of safety is not reduced. For the LOCA analysis, the power shape envelope defined by the new RAOClimits have been determined to be bounded by the chopped cosine shape forLarge break LOCA and the top-skewed shape for the small break LOCA thatform the basis for the existing analysis. Therefore, the adoption of RAOCdoes not affect the existing margin of safety for the LOCA analyses presentedin the SHNPP FSAR. The proposed changes provide the flexibility to use a Base Load mode ofoperation. The analysis to support this mode of operation is the standardWestinghouse CAOC methodology as approved by the NRC in WCAP-8385, TopicalReport - Power Distribution Control and Load Following Procedures, September1974 and is currently in use at SHNPP. The power shapes resulting fromoperating within the narrow AFD bands allowed under Base Load result ina more conservative DNBS value than those allowed under RAOC, and thereforeare bounded by the discussions mentioned previously and do not decreasethe margin of safety. The proposed change replaces the existing F<T2>xy</T2> surveillance with an F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance. F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance is an alternate method to F<T2>xy</T2> Surveillance that provides a more precise means of ensuringthat the core F<T2>Q</T2> remains within Technical Specification limits during routineoperational maneuvers and has been approved by the NRC for use with RAOC/BaseLoad operation in WCAP-10216-P-A, Relaxation of Constant Axial Offset Control,F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance Technical Specification, dated June 1983. The changeto F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance is only a change in the means by which measuredpower distributions are penalized in order to maintain actual power distributionswithin Technical Specification limits during operational maneuvers it doesnot represent a change to the limits. In addition, the existing TechnicalSpecifications allow operation to continue with F<T2>xy</T2> outside the Technical Specification limits provided an analysisof the affect on F<T2>Q</T2> is performed. The proposed F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance removes this flexibility by establishing fixedlimits on F<T2>Q</T2>. Based on the above reasoning, CPandamp;L has determined thatuse of F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance does not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. Use of F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance in combination with RAOC/Base Load has been approvedfor use at many operating facilities including McGuire Units 1 and 2 andCatawba Units 1 and 2; therefore, the margin of safety at SHNPP will nowbe comparable to that of at other Commission accepted F<T2>Q</T2> Surveillance plants. The proposed change to Technical Specification 6.9.1.6 is administrativein nature and, as such, can not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. <T3>Group 3 </T3> The changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration for thefollowing reasons: 1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposedamendment revises the equation used to determine F-Delta-H, the NuclearEnthalpy Rise Hot Channel Factor, presented in Technical Specification3.2.3.b. The existing 0.2 multiplier is being increased to 0.3. This multiplieracts to increase the allowable F-Delta-H at reduced power levels. In addition,the core limit curves presented in Technical Specification Figure 2.1-1have been revised. The proposed amendment does not affect any systems orequipment which are involved in the initiation or mitigation of any previouslyanalyzed accident and, as such, can not increase the probability of anyaccident previously evaluated. Since the increase in the F-Delta-H multiplier only allows a higher NuclearEnthalpy Rise Hot Channel Factor at power levels below 100%, the majorityof safety analyses (those initiated from full power) are not impacted.Non-LOCA transients initiated from reduced power which directly model F-Delta-Hare affected by the changes. Indirectly, any events which rely on the OT-delta-T/OP-delta-Tsetpoints for protection may be impacted by the increase in the F-Delta-Hmultiplier. Since a power dependent value of F-Delta-H is assumed in thegeneration of the core limits, the increase in F-Delta-H at reduced powerwill result in a change to the core limits below 100% power. The existingOT-delta-T/OP-delta-T setpoints were compared to the revised core limitswhich include the F-Delta-H multiplier increase. It was determined thatthe existing setpoints continue to protect the limits shown in TechnicalSpecification Figure 2.1-1, and thus events which rely on the OT-delta-T/OP-delta-Tsetpoints for protection remain within their acceptance criteria presentedin Chapter 15 of the SHNPP FSAR. The only SHNPP FSAR Chapter 15 event initiatedfrom part power is startup of an inactive loop. An evaluation has shownthat the current limit specified in FSAR Section 15.4.4 for the minimumDNBR (greater than 1.30) is met for this event with the revised F-Delta-Hmultiplier. In addition, operation with an inoperable loop is not permittedby the SHNPP Technical Specifications. Based on the above reasoning, the consequences of previously evaluatedaccidents are not increased. 2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. As stated in Item1, the proposed amendment does not introduce any new equipment or requireany existing equipment or systems to perform a different type of functionthan they are currently designed to perform. The change merely establishesrevised F-Delta-H limits at reduced power levels. Therefore, the proposedchange can not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. In addition, similar changes tothe F-Delta-H multiplier have been granted for McGuire Units 1 and 2 andCatawba Units 1 and 2. No new or different accidents from those analyzedfor SHNPP are addressed for these plants. 3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. The proposed amendment revises the equation used to determineF-Delta-H, the Nuclear Enthalpy Rise Hot Channel Factor, presented in TechnicalSpecification 3.2.3.b. The existing 0.2 multiplier is being increased to0.3. This multiplier acts to increase the allowable F-Delta-H at reducedpower levels. In addition, the core limit curves presented in TechnicalSpecification Figure 2.1-1 have been revised to reflect the increase inallowed peaking for power levels less than 100%. Since a power dependentvalue of F-Delta-H is assumed in the generation of the core limits, theincreased allowable peaking for power levels less than 100% tends to reducethe margin between the OT-delta-T trip setpoints and the curves representingthe loci of 1.30 DNBR points. Since the increase in the F-Delta-H multiplieronly allows a higher peaking at power levels below 100%, the majority ofsafety analyses (those initiated from full power) are not impacted. Theonly SHNPP FSAR Chapter 15 event initiated from part power is startup ofan inactive loop. An evaluation has shown that the current limit for theminimum DNBR (greater than 1.30) is met for this event with the revisedF-Delta-H multiplier. In addition, operation with an inoperable loop isnot permitted by the SHNPP Technical Specifications. Based on this reasoning,the Company has determined that the proposed change does not involve asignificant reduction in the margin of safety. <T3>Group 4 </T3> The changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration for thefollowing reasons: 1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The revisionto the shutdown margin requirements established in Technical Specifications3.1.1.1 and 3.1.1.2 does not increase the probability of an accident previouslyevaluated because it does not affect any systems or equipment involvedin the initiation or mitigation of any previously analyzed accident. Theproposed changes to Technical Specification 3.1.1.1 are administrativein nature. Reference to Modes 3 and 4 is deleted from Technical Specification3.1.1.1 and included in the revised Technical Specification 3.1.1.2. Thelicensing basis for SHNPP establishes 15 minutes as an acceptable operatoraction time limit for termination of an Inadvertent Boron Dilution (IBD)event. For Mode 3, an operator action time of 15 minutes to terminate theIBD event has been preserved by the proposed amendment. Also, appropriatemargins for uncertainties and malfunctions, such as a struck rod, are maintained.The IBD event for Mode 4, though not currently analyzed in the SHNPP FSAR,has been analyzed for Cycle 2 to ensure that the same criteria applicableto Mode 3 are met. This represents an added conservatism since an IBD eventis not currently analyzed in the SHNPP FSAR. The revised Technical Specification3.1.1.2 for Mode 5 increases the required shutdown margin at high boronconcentrations and reduces the required shutdown margin at low boron concentrations.The only SHNPP FSAR Chapter 15 event affected by the proposed sliding shutdownmargin coupled with the a lower High Flux at Shutdown Alarm (HFSA) setpointmaintains at least 15 minutes from alarm indication to loss of shutdownmargin and assures that appropriate margins for uncertainties and malfunctionssuch as a stuck rod are maintained. Therefore, the consequences of theIBD event are not increased. The increased minimum fluid volume requirements for the boric acid tankand the refueling water storage tank specified in Technical Specifications3.1.2.5 and 3.1.2.6 do not alter the method in which any safety relatedsystem performs its intended function. Therefore, the revision to Specifications3.1.2.5 and 3.1.2.6 does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed amendment does not require the use of a new or differentsystem than currently exists, nor does it require existing systems to performfunctions which they were not intended to perform. Therefore, the proposedamendment does not create the possibility of a new or different kind ofaccident from any accident previously evaluated. In addition, similar changesto incorporate a variable shutdown margin have been granted for V. C. Summer,Vogtle, and South Texas Project. No new or different accidents from thoseanalyzed for SHNPP are addressed for these plants. 3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. The proposed changes to Technical Specification 3.1.1.1are administrative in nature. Reference to Modes 3 and 4 is deleted fromTechnical Specification 3.1.1.1 and included in the revised Technical Specification3.1.1.2. The licensing basis for SHNPP establishes 15 minutes as an acceptableoperator action time limit for termination of an Inadvertent Boron Dilution(IBD) event. For Mode 3, an operator action time of 15 minutes to terminatethe IBD event has been preserved by the proposed amendment. Also, appropriatemargins for uncertainties and malfunctions, such as a stuck rod, are maintained.The IBD event for Mode 4, though not currently analyzed in the SHNPP FSAR,has been analyzed for Cycle 2 to ensure that the same criteria applicableto Mode 3 are met. This represents an added conservatism since an IBD eventis not currently analyzed in the SHNPP FSAR. The revised Technical Specification3.1.1.2 for Mode 5 increases the required shutdown margin at high boronconcentrations and reduces the required shutdown margin at low boron concentrations.The only SHNPP FSAR Chapter 15 event affected by the proposed reductionin shutdown margin in Mode 5 is IBD. The Mode 5 IBD event has been reviewedto ensure that during normal operation including anticipated operationaloccurrences specified fuel design limits are not exceeded. The proposedsliding shutdown margin coupled with a lower HFSA setpoint maintains atleast 15 minutes from alarm indication to loss of shutdown margin and assuresthat appropriate margins for uncertainties and malfunctions such as a stuckrod are maintained. Therefore, the revision to the shutdown margin requirementsestablished in Technical Specifications 3.1.1.1 and 3.1.1.2 does not involvea significant reduction in the margin of safety. The increased minimum fluid volume requirements for the boric acid tankand the refueling water storage tank specified in Technical Specifications3.1.2.5 and 3.1.2.6 do not alter the method in which any safety relatedsystem performs its intended function. The minimum borated water volumeswere increased so that sufficient inventory is available to provide therequired shutdown margin. Therefore, the revision to Specifications 3.1.2.5and 3.1.2.6 does not involve a reduction in the margin of safety. <T3>Group 5 </T3> The changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration for thefollowing reasons: 1. Revising the surveillance frequencies associated with calibration ofthe excore detectors from a strictly calendar basis to an Effective FullPower Days does not affect any systems or equipment which are involvedin the initiation or mitigation of any previously analyzed accident. Thechange to the surveillance interval does not alter the channels abilityto perform their necessary functions. The instruments response changesas a function of core exposure and is not dependent on the number of calendardays between surveillance. The existing Technical Specification allowsfor plant operation at 100% power for 30 calendar days, therefore, theexcore detector is currently allowed to operate for up to 30 EFPD withoutrecalibration. Since instrument response is a function of core exposure,revising the Technical Specification allows for plant operation at 100%power for 30 calendar days, therefore, the excore detector is currentlyallowed to operate for up to 30 EFPD without recalibration. Since instrumentresponse is a function of core exposure, revising the Technical Specificationsurveillance interval from 30 calendar days to 30 EFPD does not representa relaxation of current Technical Specification requirements. Therefore,the proposed revision to the Technical Specification Table 4.3-1 surveillancefrequencies does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change to the fuel assembly description in Technical Specification5.3.1 does not affect any systems or equipment involved in the initiationor mitigation of any previously analyzed accident. The change merely allowsreplacement of damaged fuel rods with filler rods or vacancies provideda cycle specific evaluation is performed to justify the modification. Therefore,the proposed revision to Technical Specification 5.3.1 does not involvea significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. 2. The proposed changes to Technical Specification Table 4.3-1 and TechnicalSpecification 5.3.1 do not require the use of a new or different systemthan currently exists, nor do they require existing systems to performfunctions for which they were not intended. Therefore, the proposed amendmentdoes not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. 3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. The change to the surveillance intervals associated withthe calibration of the excore power range channels specified in TechnicalSpecification Table 4.3-1 does not adversely affect their operability.The instruments response changes as a function of core exposure and isnot dependent on the number of calendar days between surveillance. Theexisting Technical Specification allows for plant operation at 100% powerfor 30 calendar days, therefore, the excore detector is currently allowedto operate for up to 30 EFPD without recalibration. Since instrument responseis a function of core exposure, revising the Technical Specification surveillanceinterval from 30 calendar days to 30 EFPD does not represent a relaxationof current Technical Specification requirements. Therefore, this changedoes not result in a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposed change to Technical Specification 5.3.1 allows substitutionof filler rods or vacancies for damaged fuel rods provided a cycle specificevaluation is performed to justify the modification. This evaluation willtake into account the actual configuration of the reconstituted assemblies.Therefore, the proposed revision to Technical Specification 5.3.1 doesnot involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. Based on the above, the licensee has determined that the proposed amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. The NRC staff hasreviewed the licensee's no significant hazards consideration determinationand agrees with the licensee's conclusions. Specifically, regarding Group1, Item 1, paragraph 3, the increase in the probability of a rod ejectionevent is solely a function of the number of rods in the core as there isno change in the control rod mechanism pressure housing or the surveillanceof the housing to assure its integrity which would increase the probabilityof mechanical failure. Although the probability of a rod ejection eventhas not been quantified, it is considered to be a low enough probabilityevent that the increase from four to eight rods in Control Bank D is nota significant increase in the probability of the accident. Accordingly,the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendment doesnot involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Richard B. Harrison Library,1313 New Bern Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27610 <T3>Attorney for licensees: </T3>R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Connecticut Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-213, HaddamNeck Plant, Middlesex County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>February 19, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed change will reviseTechnical Specification Table 3.11-1, ``Containment Isolation Valves''by adding five containment isolation valves (CIVs) and deleting two CIVs.Table 3.11-2 will have a page number change from 3-20d to 3-20e. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>Haddam Neck Technical Specification, Table 3.11-1, ``Containment IsolationValves,'' list CIVs that are designed to automatically close upon a highcontainment pressure or safety injection signal. During the 1987 refuelingoutage, plant modifications were implemented to containment penetrationsP-7, P-10, P-23B, P-23C, P-23D, P-30, P-31, P-35, P-36, P-37, P-38, P-41,P-59, P-60, P-70 and P-72B. CYAPCO has reviewed the proposed changes in accordance with 10 CFR 50.92and has concluded that they do not involve a significant hazards consideration.The licensee's basis for this conclusion is that the proposed amendmentwould not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated. Penetration No. P-23B is permanentlycapped. Therefore, LM-TV-1812 is not required as a CIV. Penetration No. P-7, seal water return, does not require CH-MOV-331 asa CIV due to the installation of two new CIVs, CH-TV-240 and CH-TV-241.These two new CIVs do not close automatically upon a CIS but seal watersystem leakage is included in the 3 liters per hour total leakage assumedin the design basis analysis. If CH-TV-240 or CH-TV-241 fails closed, thatfailure will not increase the probability of occurrence of a previouslyanalyzed accident or the consequences of such an accident. If either CH-TV-240or CH-TV-241 fail open when they are required to be shut, the other (nonfailed)valve will provide the closing function since they are in series. (Thisis the basic principle of 10 CFR 50, Appendix A, General Design Criterion56.) Therefore, whether CH-TV-240 or CH-TV-241 fails open or closed, nonew failure mechanism is introduced. If LD-TV-230 inadvertently closes or fails closed, letdown flow would stopand a level excursion would result in the pressurizer. In this event, theoperators would establish an alternate letdown flow path in accordancewith plant procedures. This does not constitute a new failure mechanismsince the potential already exists for the three existing AOVs (LD-FCV-202,203, and 204) to fail closed. The probability or consequences of a designbasis event will not be increased. The excursion caused by LD-TV-230 goingclosed will not initiate a design basis accident. If LD-TV-230 fails openwith a CIS, LD-FCV-202, 203, and 204 will shut since only one active failureis assumed. Therefore, the probability of occurrence or consequences ofa previously analyzed accident will not increase if LD-TV-230 fails open.If HS-TV-380 or 381 fails (either closed or open) the failure would notincrease the probability of occurrence or consequences of any accidentpreviously evaluated in the Safety Analysis Report since they are not partof a safety-related system and provide no safety function. Failure or inadvertent closure of CC-TV-917 or CC-TV-920 would eventuallyresult in an increase in temperature of the neutron shield tank. However,this failure will not initiate nor increase the consequences or probabilityof a design basis event. Therefore, the probability of occurrence or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated will not be increased since that failuremechanism already existed with CC-TV-1831 which is also contained in theCCW line from the neutron shield tank cooler and closes on a CIS. If eitherCC-TV-917 or 920 fails open on a CIS, the nonfailed valve will accomplishthe closing function and provide containment isolation for that penetration.Furthermore, adding five new valves and deleting two valves to Table 3.11-1does not increase the probability of occurrence or the consequences ofan accident or malfunction of equipment important to safety previouslyevaluated in the Safety Analysis Report since the change involves addingmore valves to the list of CIVs that automatically close. Adding thesefive (5) new automatic valves to the list provides more assurance thatthe CIVs will function when required. This assurance includes both thatthe valves will close automatically and that their leakage when closedis below that assumed in the design basis accidents. Therefore, the changedoes not adversely impact the consequences or increase the probabilityof the design basis accidents. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anypreviously evaluated. The possibility for an accident or malfunction ofa different type than any accident previously evaluated in the Safety AnalysisReport is not created since: <ITAG tagnum="24">andbullet; with respect to CH-TV-240 and 241, the failure mechanism(fail closed) already existed with CH-TV-334, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">andbullet; with respect to LD-TV-230, the failure mechanism (fail closed)already existed with LD-FCV-202, 203, and 204, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">andbullet; with respect to HS-TV-380 and 381, the house heating steamsystem does not serve any safety-related function, and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">andbullet; with respect to CC-TV-917 and 920, the failure mechanismalready exists with CC-TV-1831. </ITAG>The change increases the number of valves to the list of containment isolationvalves. Adding the above valves to the list does not modify plant responseor affect the probability of any new accident. There are no failure modesassociated with the technical specification change. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The leak ratetesting associated with the penetrations affected ensure that there isno adverse impact on containment integrity. The additions to these systemsimprove the margin of safety because the penetrations affected now conformto 10 CFR 50, Appendix A, GDC 56 and allow for leak testing in accordancewith 10 CFR 50, Appendix J. Since the proposed changes to the technicalspecifications do not affect the consequences of any accident previouslyanalyzed, there is no reduction in a margin of safety. The staff has reviewed the licensee's determination that the proposed licenseamendment involves no significant hazards consideration and agrees withthe licensee's analysis. Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determinethat the proposed changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Russel Library, 123 BroadStreet, Middletown, Connecticut 06457. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andamp;Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket Nos. 50-003 and 50-247,Indian Point Nuclear Generating Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Westchester County,New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 8, 1986, December 14, 1987and March 3, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>In accordance with the requirementsof 10 CFR 73.55, the licensee submitted an amendment to the Physical SecurityPlan for the Indian Point Nuclear Generating Unit Nos. 1 and 2 to reflectrecent changes to that regulation. The proposed amendments would modifyparagraph 3.D of Facility Operating License No. DPR-5 and paragraph 2.Jof Facility Operating License No. DPR-26 to require compliance with therevised Plan. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>On August 4, 1986 (51 FR 27817 and 27822), the Nuclear RegulatoryCommission amended Part 73 of its regulations, ``Physical Protection ofPlants and Materials,'' to clarify plant security requirements to affordan increased assurance of plant safety. The amended regulations requiredthat each nuclear power reactor licensee submit proposed amendments toits security plan to implement the revised provisions of 10 CFR 73.55.The licensee submitted its revised plan on December 8, 1986, December 14,1987 and March 30, 1988, to satisfy the requirements of the amended regulations.The Commission proposes to amend the licenses to reference the revisedplan. In the Supplementary Materials accompanying the amended regulations, theCommission indicated that it was amending its regulations ``to providea more safety conscious safeguards system while maintaining the currentlevels of protection'' and that the ``Commission believes that the clarificationand refinement of requirements as reflected in these amendments is appropriatebecause they afford an increased assurance of plant safety.'' The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thecriteria for determining whether a significant hazards consideration existsby providing certain examples of actions involving no significant hazardsconsiderations and examples of actions involving significant hazards considerations(51 FR 7750). One of these examples of actions involving no significanthazards considerations is example (vii) ``a change to conform a licenseto changes in the regulations, where the license change results in veryminor changes to facility operations clearly in keeping with the regulations.''The changes in this case fall within the scope of the example. For theforegoing reasons, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposedamendments involve no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York, 10610. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Brent L. Brandenburg, Esq., 4 Irving Place,New York, New York 10003. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket Nos. 50-003 and 50-247,Indian Point Nuclear Generating Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Westchester County,New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendments request: </T3>April 15, 1988 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise the Indian Point 1 and 2 Technical Specifications concerning organization.Specifically, the Director, Power Generation Services, has been promotedto the title Assistant Vice President, Power Generation Services, reportingdirectly to the Senior Vice President, Central Operations. The Senior VicePresident, Central Operations, reports to an Executive Vice President,whose responsibilities, while not indicated in the revised organizationchart have been expanded. The Executive Vice President reports to the President.In the current Specifications, the position of Senior Vice President CentralOperations does not exist. Instead the Director, Power Generation Services,is shown to report to the Executive Vice President Central Operations,who reports to the President. Additionaly, changes are being made to theNuclear Power Organization chart. The Chemistry Manager and staff, formerlyreporting to the General Manager, Technical Support, will now report tothe General Manager, Environmental Health and Safety. The Test and Performancegroup, currently shown to report to the General Manager, Technical Support,will report to the Chief Plant Engineer who reports to the General Manager,Technical Support. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated, or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in margin of safety. The licensee has determined, and the NRC staff agrees that the proposedamendments will not involve a significant hazards consideration. The proposedchanges will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated in that the proposed changes reflectthe licensee's reorganization with realignment and consolidation of responsibilities.The changes are administrative and as such do not involve hardware or proceduralchanges to the facility. The amendments will not create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident because the proposed changes areintended to enhance the licensee's organization and as stated previouslydo not involve any facility hardware or procedural changes. The proposedchanges do not involve a reduction in margin of safety because the changesare administrative in nature. All functions performed previously will continueto be performed by the new organizations. Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed changesdo not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York, 10610. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Brent L. Brandenburg, Esq., 4 Irving Place,New York, New York 10003 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket No. 50-247, IndianPoint Nuclear Generating Unit No. 2, Westchester County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 13, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed changes to theIndian Point 2 Technical Specifications will remove fire protection requirementsin accordance with Generic Letter 86-10. The fire protection requirementswhich would be removed by the proposed changes have been incorporated intothe ``Indian Point 2 Fire Protection Plan'' which is referenced as partof the updated FSAR and implemented by plant procedures with the exceptionof plant shutdown restrictions associated with the high pressure waterfire protection system as contained in Specification 3.13.A.3(c). Specificallythe following changes are requested: (1) Technical Specification 3.13, Fire Protection and Detection Systems,would be deleted. (2) Technical Specification 4.14, Fire Protection and Detection Systems(Surveillance Requirements) would be deleted. (3) Technical Specification 6.2.2, Facility Staff, would be revised todelete item f<T2>q</T2> which identifies the requirements for fire brigade. (4) Technical Specification 6.4, Training, would be revised to delete Section6.4.2 which requires a fire brigade training program. (5) Technical Specification 6.5.2.8, Audits, would be revised to deleteitems h, i, and j which require periodic audits of the facility fire protectionand loss prevention program and implementing procedures. (6) Technical Specification 6.9.2, Special Reports, would be revised todelete item b which deletes the reporting requirement associated with theinoperability of the fire protection and detection equipment within thescope of Technical Specification 3.13. (7) License Condition 2.K dealing with changes to the Fire Protection Programwould be revised to address the fire protection program plan as describedby reference in the updated Final Safety Analysis Report. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>10 CFR 50.92 states that a proposed amendment will involve a no significanthazards consideration if the proposed amendment does not: (1) involve asignificant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated, or (2) create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident previously evaluated, or (3) involve a significant reductionin margin of safety. The licensee provided the following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">``...the aforementioned proposed change would not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated, since the fire protection programrequirements are not being changed, with the exception of deletion of theplant shutdown restriction requirements presently dictated by Specification3.13.A.3(c) for the high pressure water fire protection system. Deletionof these requirements would not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated because the Fire HazardsAnalysis does not solely rely on the high pressure water protection systemto ensure the capability to achieve safe shutdown in the event of a fire,and the plant accident analysis does not assume that a Design Basis Accidentoccurs simultaneously with a fire. The IP-2 Alternate Safe Shutdown System(ASSS), which assures that the plant can be brought to a controlled safeshutdown given a fire, does not rely on the high pressure water system.In any case, several means of fire detection and fire protection are notaffected by the loss of the high pressure water system and therefore remainoperable. These fire protection capabilities include fire detection instrumentation,plant fire barriers, halon fire suppression and backup hydrants suppliedby city water. Also, impairment criteria in the IP-2 Fire Protection ProgramPlan (FPPP) requires establishment of an additional backup fire protectionsystem or verification of ASSS operability within 24 hours. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) create the possibility for a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously evaluated, since the proposed change does not involveany physical change in plant equipment. The shutdown requirement is unnecessarybecause fire detection and fire protection capabilities remain availablein the event of the loss of the high pressure water system. Thus, deletionof this shutdown requirement will not create the possibility for a newor different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. With the exceptionof the unnecessary shutdown requirement, those aspects of the fire protectionprogram covered by existing Technical Specifications will continue to beimplemented. The FPPP includes the program aspects and fire protectiondesign provisions pertaining to safety related and safe shutdown featuresin effect at IP-2. Implementation and maintenance of the fire protectionprogram will continue to require operability of the fire protection designfeatures presently covered by the requested change to License Condition2.K, which requires the approved fire protection program, as describedby reference in the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report (UFSAR), to continueto be properly implemented and maintained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety, sincethe fire protection program compliance will continue as required by proposedLicense Condition 2.K as part of the UFSAR. With the proposed change, allsafety criteria previously evaluated are still met and remain conservative.The periodic testing and inspection of the fire protection design featuresand actions to be taken in the event of inoperability currently addressedin the Technical Specifications have been included in the impairment criteriaof the IP-2 FPPP and implemented by controlled plant procedures to conformto the current interpretation of NRC fire protection regulations. The proposeddeletion of the shutdown requirement for loss of the high pressure waterfire protection system does not involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety since alternate means of fire detection and fire protectionremain available. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change would revise License Condition 2.K to requireimplementation and maintenance in effect of the approved fire protectionprogram which is described in the UFSAR, and the ``Indian Point Unit 2Fire Protection Program Plan,'' which by reference, is part of the USFARand contains the Fire Hazards Analysis. The USFAR is updated annually inaccordance with 10CFR50.71(e). The proposed License Condition would allowCon Edison to make changes to the approved fire protection program withoutprior NRC approval provided that those changes do not adversely affectthe ability to achieve and maintain safe shutdown in the event of a fire.The proposed License Condition is consistent with the standard licensecondition provided by Generic Letter 86-10. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change would also delete exisiting technical specificationsrelating to implementation of the fire protection program. Those aspectsof the fire protection program covered by existing technical specificationwill continue to be implemented. Deletion of the technical specificationrequirements as describe above is consistent with NRC Generic Letter 86-10.''</ITAG>Based on the above, the staff proposes that the proposed amendment doesnot involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York, 10610. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Brent L. Brandenburg, Esq., 4 Irving Place,New York, New York 10003 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket No. 50-247, IndianPoint Nuclear Generating Unit No. 2, Westchester County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 18, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Indian Point 2 Technical Specifications to correct typographicalerrors, make editorial changes and to repaginate the text for uniformitypurposes. In addition, the amendment would delete pertinent portions ofthe Technical Specifications that related to one-time only date extensionswhich have since expired and to plant equipment which had been removedfrom service pursuant to previously received submittals. An example ofthe former is the statement, ``The January 1976 scheduled measurementswith the moveable Incore Instrumentation System may be delayed until February6, 1976,'' which is located currently in Section 3.11 of the Indian Point2 Technical Specifications. An example of the latter is snubber 17-SR-1(listed in Table 3.12-1, Sheet 4 of 13) which has a double-asterick denotingthat removal of this snubber has been approved, this snubber will be removedand at that time shall be considered deleted from this Table. Since thesnubber has been physically removed from the system, it is being removedfrom the Table. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application ofthe standards in 10 CFR 50.92 by providing certain examples (March 6, 1986,51 FR 7751) of amendments that are not likely to involve a significanthazards consideration. The proposed changes are enveloped by example (i)which relates to a purely administrative change to the Technical Specifications;for example, a change to achieve consistency throughout the Technical Specifications,correction of an error or a change in nomenclature. The proposed changescorrect typographical errors, makes editorial changes for consistency,repaginates the document and deletes obsolete information. Therefore, the staff proposed that the changes will not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10610. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Brent L. Brandenburg, Esq., 4 Irving Place,New York, New York 10003 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-341, Fermi-2, Monroe County,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 26, 1988 (NRC-87-0202) <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed license amendmentwould change Technical Specifications 3/4.8.3.1., ``Onsite Power DistributionSystems - Operating'', and 3/4.8.3.2, ``Onsite Power Distribution Systems- Shutdown'', to clarify the Limiting Condition for Operation of the 480vMCC 72CF swing bus. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has determined, and the Commission agrees, that the proposedchanges to the Technical Specifications: (1) Do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The changes to specifically denotethe operability requirement of the 480v MCC 72CF swing bus are clarificationsonly and are added to achieve consistency between the Limiting Conditionof Operation and the corresponding surveillance requirement and to achieveconsistency throughout the Technical Specifications. The changes only explicitlydenote the requirements which have always been implicit to the operabilityof the swing bus and are considered not to involve a significant hazardsconsideration. (2) Do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. As stated in (1) above, these areeditorial clarifications only and are added for consistency. These changesdo not result in any modification to the plant or system operation andno safety-related equipment or function will be altered. The requestedchanges do not create any new accident mode. (3) Do not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. As statedin (1) above, these are editorial clarifications only and are added forconsistency. Moreover, the changes will clarify for the operators, specificactions which have in the past been implicit in the Technical Specifications.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposed amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,3700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 48161. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>John Flynn, Esq., Detroit Edison Company,2000 Second Avenue, Detroit, Michigan 48226. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Martin J. Virgilio. <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-269, 50-270, and 50-287, OconeeNuclear Station, Units 1, 2, and 3, Oconee County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 1, 1987, as supplemented on November24, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise the Station's common Technical Specifications (TSs) to update theLOCA - Limited Maximum Allowable Linear Heat Rate (Figure 3.5.2-16). Theserevisions would reflect NUREG-0630, Cladding Swelling and Rupture Modelsfor LOCA Analysis and Babcock and Wilcox (Bandamp;W) Owners' Group TopicalReport BAW-1915P, Bounding Analytical Assessment of NUREG-0630 models ofLOCA Kw/ft limits with use of FLECSET. A generic bounding assessment of the impact of NUREG-0630 on loss-of-coolantaccident (LOCA) linear heat rate (LHR) limits has been performed by Bandamp;Won behalf of the Bandamp;W Owners Group. The evaluation was performed forall core elevations consistent with Bandamp;W Emergency Core Cooling System(ECCS) Evaluation Model methods. The impact of NUREG-0630 was a reductionin LOCA LHR limits at the 2, 4, and 6-foot core elevations because of rupturetime dependency of these elevations. In an effort to reduce the NUREG-0630 impact, the Bandamp;W Owners' Grouphas incorporated the benefits of using compensating models. Bandamp;W hasevaluated the FLECHT-SEASET heat transfer correlation and modified it forBandamp;W plant application. The modified correlation is modeled in the computerprogram ``FLECSET''. BAW-1915P and BAW-10104 Revision 5 have been reviewed by the Commissionand approved on October 5 and December 27, 1987. These reports providethe technical basis for this revision. The models addressed in these reportsare used to determine the LOCA-Limited Maximum Allowable LHR. The proposedrevision to Figure 3.5.2-16 reflects application of the new models. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application ofthe standards in 10 CFR 50.92 by providing certain examples (51 FR 7744).Example (vi) of the types of amendments not likely to involve significanthazards considerations is a change which either may result in some increaseto the probability or consequences of a previously-analyzed accident ormay reduce in some way a safety margin but where the results of the changesare clearly within all acceptable criteria with respect to the system orcomponent specified in the Standard Review Plan: for example, a changeresulting from the application of a small refinement of a previously usedcalculational model or design method. This proposed revision will update the LOCA-Limited Maximum Allowable LinearHeat Rate (Figure 3.5.2-16) to reflect NUREG-0630 and FLECSET data. Assuch, the previously analyzed accident that is applicable to this changewould be a large break loss of coolant accident. Acceptance criteria forthis event are identified in 10 CFR Part 50.46 and 10 CFR Part 50, AppendixK. FLECSET and BAW-10104P Rev. 5 (Bandamp;W's ECCS Evaluation Model) havebeen reviewed by the Commission. FLECSET is a Bandamp;W modified version of the FLECHT-SEASET reflood heattransfer correlation. Reflood heat transfer coefficients versus time werecalculated using FLECSET and compared to those calculated by the presentlarge break LOCA Evaluation Model (BAW-10104, Rev. 3). The FLECSET refloodheat transfer coefficients at the 2-foot core elevation are higher thanthose calculated by the current Evaluation Model during the early stageof reflooding. These higher reflood heat transfer coefficients allow thepeak cladding temperature to turn over earlier in the transient. The licensee considers the correlation in FLECSET to be a more accuratecorrelation than that used in the current Evaluation Model (BAW-10104 Rev.3) and is applicable for predicting reflood heat transfer coefficientsto both skewed and cosine power shapes at any core elevation. Test benchmarkshave been provided to demonstrate the ability of the Bandamp;W modified FLECSETcode to conservatively predict experimental data. The staff has agreedthat comparisons of FLECSET predictions to FLECHT test data and semiscaledata demonstrate that FLECSET is conservative as used for Oconee. Justification for use of the FLECSET code is based on (1) comparisons ofcalculated heat transfer coefficients calculated by FLECSET with thosecalculated by the present Evaluation Model, and (2) comparison with experimentaldata. Each accident analysis addressed in the Oconee Final Safety Analysis Report(FSAR) has been examined with respect to changes to the LOCA - LimitedMaximum Allowable Linear Heat Rate (Figure 3.5.2-16) resulting from theuse of FLECSET and NUREG-0630 data. The limiting FSAR accident becauseof this change is a large break LOCA. The staff has determined in its approval of FLECSET and BAW-10104 Rev.5, and the analysis result applicable to Oconee, that operating conditionsdetermined by such models are consistent with all NRC acceptance criteriaand requirements including the NRC acceptance criteria for LOCAs identifiedin 10 CFR Part 50.46 and 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix K. The proposed amendment is similar to example (vi) and accordingly, theCommission proposes to determine that the amendment revisions do not involvesignificant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Oconee County Library, 501West Southbroad Street, Walhalla, South Carolina 29691 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>J. Michael McGarry, III, Bishop, Liberman,Cook, Purcell and Reynolds, 1200 17th Street, NW., Washington, DC 20036<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, CatawbaNuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 29, 1987, as supplemented December4, 1987 and April 1, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise Technical Specification (TS) Table 4.3-1, ``Reactor Trip SystemsInstrumentation Surveillance Requirements'' to delete the requirement totest the reactor coolant flow rates in the bypass loops in which ResistanceTemperature Detectors (RTDs) are installed to measure the hot leg and coldleg temperatures. The revisions are applicable to Catawba Unit 1 only;however, Unit 2 is included administratively because the TSs for both Unitsare combined in one document. The flow rates affect the time response ofthe temperature signals which are needed for reactor controls and protection.The licensee proposes to remove the RTD bypass manifolds in Unit 1 andto place the RTDs directly in the hot leg and cold leg pipes, thereby eliminatingthe need for bypass flow testing requirements. The proposed station modificationshave already been completed for Unit 2 during its recent refueling outage.For Unit 1, they will be completed during its fourth refueling outage scheduledto end in March 1990. In response to the licensee's letters of June 29 and December 4, 1987,the staff has previously published a <T4>Federal Register </T4>Notice (52 FR 49223). The licensee's letter ofApril 1, 1988, informed the staff that the modifications were completedfor Unit 2 and the schedule for Unit 1 modifications was changed from January1989 to March 1990. For Catawba Unit 1 the next flow rate verification tests are due in May1988 according to the TS requirement for flow rate verification tests every18 months. The proposed amendments would exempt the licensee from the requirementto perform these tests. In its letters of June 29 and December 4, 1987, and April 1, 1988, thelicensee provided the following justifications for the proposed changes:1. The performance of the RTD Bypass Loop flow rate test involves fourpeople (two Nuclear Equipment Operators, one Performance Technician andone Health Physics Technician) spending four hours each in lower containment,which results in a significant dose to those involved. 2. There is minimal potential for flow blockage in the 2-inch and 3-inchdiameter bypass lines. 3. Individual low flow alarms with individual status lights for each reactorcoolant loop bypass flow are provided on the main control board. The alarmand status lights provide the operator with immediate indication of lowflow condition in the bypass loops associated with any reactor coolantloop. If the RTD Bypass Loop flow rate for Loop A, B, C or D decreasesto 90% of its initial measured value, an annunciator alarms in the controlroom. Since the initial measured values for all of the loop flows are wellabove the minimum acceptable flow rates, the control room annunciator willalarm well in advance of any loop flow rate dropping below the acceptancecriterion flow rate. A quarterly channel calibration will be performedon the control room low flow alarms. 4. Local indicators are provided to monitor total flow through the RTDbypass manifolds for each loop. The indicators are located inside containmentbut are accessible during power operations. These indicators will be monitoredquarterly, as well as following any bypass low flow alarm or followinga period when a bypass loop has been out of service. 5. The deletion of the flow rate verification tests will have no effectupon the ability of the RTDs to perform their intended safety functions.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed amendments will not (1) involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated becausethe deletion of the bypass flow rate verification tests will not degradethe safety aspects of the RTD temperature measurement capability. Low bypassflow rates will continue to be alarmed in the control room, and the flowrates will continue to be measured quarterly on the local flow rate indicators.The proposed amendments will not (2) create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated becausethe design and operation of the plant will be unaffected and no new plantconfigurations are introduced. The proposed amendment will not (3) involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety because of the continued availability of the local flowrate indicators and of the low flow alarms in the control room. Based on the above considerations, the Commission proposes to determinethat the proposed amendments involve no significant hazards considerations.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>York County Library, 138East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, CatawbaNuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>February 15, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise Technical Specification (TS) 4.8.1.1.2g.7) and add TS 4.8.1.1.2g.15)to permit testing of the diesel generators (DGs) for a 24 hour (or more)test run and a Hot Restart with full engineered safety features (ESF) loadacceptance separately and independently. Currently, these tests are carriedout in succession. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the amendmentrequest involves no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission'sregulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facilityin accordance with the proposed amendments would not (1) involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The bases for this proposed determination are discussedbelow for the separation of the 24-hour diesel run and the Hot Restartwith full ESF Load Test. The licensee states that this change separatesthe two tests (24 hour run and Hot Restart) in order to minimize delaysassociated with testing during plant outages. As a result of the change,the Hot Restart Testing requirements are virtually unchanged because theDGs would be operated until temperature stabilization is achieved whichis the objective in both cases. This proposed change would not (1) involvea significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated because the Hot Restart testing requirements are virtuallyunchanged. This proposed change would not (2) create the possibility ofa new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluatedbecause the tests under the proposed change would be carried out underconditions which are nearly identical to those required for the currenttests. Because the proposed change does not significantly alter the requirementsfor either the 24 hour test run or the Hot Restart test with full ESF loadacceptance, it provides nearly the same degree of assurance regarding theDG operability and reliability. Therefore, the proposed change would not(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Accordingly,the Commission proposes to determine that the change does not involve asignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>York County Library, 138East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-219, Oyster Creek NuclearGenerating Station, Ocean County, New Jersey </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 23, 1986 (TSCR 148) as revisedApril 5, 1988. The October 23, 1986 submittal was published in the FederalRegister on November 19, 1986 (51 FR 41855) <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the requirements on the maximum radioiodine concentration allowedin the reactor coolant in Sections 3.6 and 4.6, Radioactive effluents,in the Appendix A Technical Specifications (TS). The proposed changes (1)add a new definition to Section 1.0, Definitions, and to the Table of Contents,(2) reduce the maximum allowed concentration of radioiodine in the reactorcoolant in Section 3.6, (3) add reporting requirements to Section 3.6,(4) add sampling and analysis requirements for iodine following changesin thermal power or offgas level to Section 3.6, and (5) restrict the reactormodes, where a radioiodine sample is required to be taken, to the Run,Startup and Shutdown Modes in Section 4.6. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The licensee stated in its amendment request that on October 22, 1984,it submitted Technical Specification Change Request (TSCR) No. 69, Revision1, ``Radiological Effluent Environmental Technical Specifications.'' TheTSCR No. 69, Revision 1 proposed changes to TS Sections 3.6 and 4.6 concerningreactor coolant system (RCS) radioiodine activity limits and surveillancerequirements. These changes were proposed following discussions with theNRC staff during the integrated assessment of the Systematic EvaluationProgram (SEP) for Topic XV-16, ``Radiological Consequences of Failure ofSmall Lines Carrying Primary Coolant Outside Containment.'' Subsequently, the NRC staff requested resubmittal of the proposed changesfor RCS radioactivity limits by providing a definition for Dose EquivalentIodine I-131, limits for non-iodine radioactivity in the RCS and an annualreporting requirement for radioiodine spiking as shown in Standard TechnicalSpecifications for General Electric Boiling Water Reactors (NUREG-0123)and NRC Generic Letter 85-19, ``Reporting Requirement on Primary CoolantIodine Spikes.'' The staff also requested changes to the Limiting Conditionsfor Operation which are also given in NUREG-0123. During a meeting of June 30, 1987, the staff requested resubmittal of theproposed changes with the following provisions: 1. Delete words ``if inhaled by an adult'' from the definition of DoseEquivalent (D.E.) I-131. 2. Incorporate provisions for performing additional analyses at least onceper four hours until the specific activity of the primary coolant is restoredto within its limit when the coolant activity exceeds 0.2 uCi/gram D.E.I-131. 3. Eliminate provisions for allowing a second sample, and place the reactorin hot shutdown within 12 hours when the coolant activity exceeds 4 uCi/gramD.E. I-131. 4. Add sampling and analysis requirements for iodine following changesin thermal power or offgas level. Therefore, the licensee has prepared TSCR 148 and TSCR 148, Revision 1in response to the staff's requests described above. This change request provides definitions, limiting conditions for operation,surveillance and an annual reporting requirement to incorporate the applicablerequirements provided in the Standard Technical Specifications for GeneralElectric Boiling Water Reactors and NRC Generic Letter 85-19. The licenseehas determined that this change request involves no significant hazardsconsiderations in that operation of the Oyster Creek Plant in accordancewith the proposed amendment will: 1. Not involve a significant increase in the probability of an accidentpreviously evaluated, because the primary coolant activity is not an initiatorof an accident. Also, the proposed change will not increase the consequencesof an accident, because the proposed change, a reduction of the primarycoolant activity limit, will not result in an increased amount of radioactiverelease for design basis accidents previously evaluated; or 2. Not create the probability of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated because a bounding design basis accidentassociated with changes in the primary coolant activity level was alreadyevaluated and reported in the updated Final Safety Analysis Report (FSAR)(i.e., Control Rod Drop Accident); or 3. Not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety because amore restrictive limit for the primary coolant radio-iodine activity willincrease a margin of safety. The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazard considerationsabove and is in agreement with the conclusions drawn by the licensee. Therefore, because the licensee's request meets the above three criteriain 10 CFR 50.92(c), the staff proposed to determine that the licensee'sproposed change does not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Ocean County Library, ReferenceDepartment, 101 Washington Street, Toms River, New Jersey 08753 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Esquire. Shaw, Pittman,Potts, andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper NuclearStation, Nemaha County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 19, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would modify theTechnical Specifications (TS) to (1) add an annual time limit on containmentventing and purging via the Standby Gas Treatment System, and (2) add LimitingConditions for Operation and Surveillance Requirements for devices installedin certain large containment isolation valves for the purposes of insuringcapability to close against the dynamic forces of a loss-of-coolant accident(LOCA). <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance for the application of criteriafor no significant hazards consideration determination by providing examplesof amendments that are considered not likely to involve significant hazardsconsiderations (51 FR 7751). These examples include, ``A change that constitutesan additional limitation, restriction, or control not presently includedin the Technical Specifications, e.g., a more stringent surveillance requirement.''The proposed amendment would add additional limitations and requirementsfor which no comparable requirements are presently specified. These newrequirements will provide additional assurance of containment integrityand continued vent/purge capability in event of a LOCA which occurs duringroutine vent/purge operations. Since the application for amendment involves proposed changes that areencompassed by an example for which no significant hazards considerationexists, the staff has made a proposed determination that the applicationinvolves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Auburn Public Library, 11815th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. G.D. Watson, Nebraska Public PowerDistrict, Post Office Box 499, Columbus, Nebraska 68601. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>By application for license amendmentdated April 25, 1988, Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al. (the licensee),requested a change to Technical Specifications (TS) 3.4.4, ``Pressurizer,''for Millstone Unit 2. The proposed change to the TS would require thatthe 130KW of operable pressurizer heaters be, ``...capable of being suppledby emergency power.'' <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The requirement that 130KW of pressurizer heaters, capable of beingsupplied by emergency power, be operable, had previously been incorporatedin the Millstone Unit 2 TS. In the course of issuing License AmendmentNo. 97 on August 24, 1984, the words ``...capable of being supplied byemergency power'' were inadvertently deleted. The proposed change to theTS would correct the error introduced with issuance of License AmendmentNo. 97. On March 6, 1986, the NRC published guidance in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(51 FR 7751) concerning examples of amendmentsthat are not likely to involve a significant hazards consideration. Oneexample of amendments not likely to involve significant hazards considerationsis example (i) which involves ``A purely administrative change to technicalspecifications: for example, a change to achieve consistency throughoutthe technical specifications, correction of an error, or a change in nomenclature.''The proposed change to TS 3.4.4 is within scope of example (i) in thatit would correct an error in the TS. Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andHoward, One Constitution Plaza, Hartford, Connecticut 06103. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 15, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldchange Technical Specification Section 3/4.6.3 Containment Isolation Valvesto permit the plant to enter an operational mode when the plant has inoperablecontainment isolation valves that have been compensated for by compliancewith action statement b. and c. These action statements require that eachaffected penetration be isolated within four hours by use of at least onedeactivated automatic valve secured in the isolation position or one closedmanual valve or blind flange. Specifically, the change would indicate thatthe provisions of Specification 3.0.4 are not applicable to action statementsb and c. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>In accordance with 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has reviewed the proposedchange and has concluded that it does not involve a significant hazardsconsideration because the change does not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated. The proposed change has no impact onthe probability of an accident. Allowing plant startup with isolation valvesclosed and de-energized or the penetration isolated with a blind flangeprovides at least the same level of assurance that the affected penetrationswill be isolated when required as normal operating conditions. Becausethe ability to isolate the containment is not adversely affected, therecan be no adverse impact on the consequences of any accident. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated. The proposed change will not affect plantresponse in any way, and there are no new failure modes associated withthe change that could create a new accident. The specific valves whichare inoperable have no safety function other than containment isolation,which is satisfied by meeting the Action statements. These valves are notassociated with a post accident situation. 3. Involve a significant reduction in safety margin. The proposed changewill apply only when the inoperable containment isolation valve(s) areisolated by use of at least one deactivated automatic valve secured inthe closed position or by use of a closed manual valve or blind flange.In this position, the penetration is isolated. Therefore, the proposedchange does not have any adverse impact on the containment boundary. Allowingplant startup in this configuration involves no adverse impact. The basisof Technical Specification 3.6.3 is to ensure that the containment canbe isolated from the outside atmosphere when required. Allowing plant start-upwith affected penetrations isolated is consistent with the basis of thisTechnical Specification. Accordingly, the staff has mode a proposed determination that the applicationfor amendment involves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andamp;Howard, One Constitution Plaza, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Northern States Power Company, Docket No. 50-263, Monticello NuclearGenerating Plant, Wright County, Minnesota </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 1, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed license amendmentwould revise the plant Technical Specifications (Appendix A to FacilityOperating License No. DPR-22) to reflect an increase in the Boron-10 enrichmentto 55 atom percent in the sodium pentaborate solution used for the StandbyLiquid Control System (SLCS). This results in a solution concentrationas low as 10.7% versus the minimum 13.7% concentration stipulated in 10CFR 50.62. To maintain an equivalent injection capability, the effect ofa higher atom percent Boron-10 enrichment and lower solution concentrationis to reduce the system flow rate from 26 gpm to 24 gpm. The proposed amendmentwould delete the requirement for a mid-cycle sodium pentaborate solutionsurveillance due to the availability and planned use of pre-mixed and vendorcertified solutions. This precludes the need for the licensee to mix thesolution components (Boric acid and Borax) on site. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92). A proposed amendment to anoperating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has determined, and the Commission agrees, that the proposedTechnical Specification changes for the SLCS do not constitute a significanthazards consideration for the following reasons: 1. The proposed amendment revises the Technical Specifications to reflecta sodium pentaborate solution which has a Boron-10 enrichment of 55 atompercent supplied by a vendor in its final form, and certified to the specifiedBoron-10 enrichment by the vendor. This change in no way detracts fromthe ability to meet the requirements of the Anticipated Transient WithoutScram (ATWS) Rule. The proposed Technical Specification changes, with adecrease in the minimum pump flow rates and increase in the Boron-10 enrichment,maintain the ATWS Rule goal of reducing the time necessary to achieve plantcold shutdown. As such, the proposed changes do not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated,or the ability of the SLCS to deal with an accident. 2. The proposed amendment does not result in any mechanical modificationof the SLCS. Boron-10 is a stable isotope and no degradation of the enrichmentlevel over time is expected. Other solution characteristics, such as concentration,are within the ranges of past operations. The minimum pump flow rate specifiedby the proposed changes is a return to the value contained in the TechnicalSpecifications prior to the implementation of the ATWS Rule. The requirementfor a mid-cycle enrichment surveillance when new chemicals are added wasinstituted because of mixing of the individual solution components (thatis enriched boric acid and borax) by the licensee on site. The sodium pentaboratewill be supplied pre-mixed and certified by a vendor to the specified Boron-10enrichment. This change eliminates the possibility of an accident at theplant site due to the mixing process. For these reasons, the proposed amendmentdoes not create a new or different kind of accident from previously evaluatedaccidents. 3. The proposed amendment would not diminish the ability of the SLCS tomeet its original design basis or the requirements of the ATWS Rule. Thereduction in the minimum pump flow rate from 26 gpm to 24 gpm actuallyprovides for additional margin in the pump flow rate. As such, the proposedchange enhances rather than reduces the margin of safety. Based on the above, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposedamendment involves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Minneapolis Public Library,Technology and Science Department, 300 Nicollet Mall, Minneapolis, Minnesota55401. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller, Acting Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Portland General Electric Company et al., Docket No. 50-344, TrojanNuclear Plant, Columbia County, Oregon </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 31, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The propsed amendment wouldrevise Trojan Technical Specifications (TS) Section 6.0, ``AdministrativeControls'' by deleting the organizational charts, Figure 6.2-1 ``OffsiteOrganization,'' and Figure 6.2-2 ``Facility Organization'' from the TS.The TS would also be revised to provide a description of the general requirementsfor both facility and corporate organizations. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>10 CFR 50.92 states that a proposed amendment will not involve a significanthazards consideration if the propsed amendment does not: (i) Involve asignificant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated; or (ii) Create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (iii) Involvea significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed amendment against the standardsof 10 CFR 50.92, and has determined the following: The proposed changes do not significantly increase the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated since deletion of the organizationcharts from the Technical Specifications is administrative in nature anddoes not affect plant operation. The organizational requirements essentialto safe operation are still contained in the Technical Specifications.In addition, a description of the organization and organization chartsare provided in the Updated Final Safety Evaluation Report (UFSAR). Changesto the organizational structure are included in the annual updates to theUFSAR, and are also discussed in the licensee's changes to the QualityAssurance Program. The proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any previously evaluated because the proposed changeis administrative in nature, and no physical alterations of plant configurationor changes to setpoints or operating parameters are proposed. The proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety. PGE's QA programs and its use of only qualified personnel inpositions of responsibility assures that safety functions performed byboth facility and corporate organizations will continue to be performedat a high level of competence. The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards analysis andconcurs with their conclusions. As such, the staff proposes to determinethat the requested changes do not involve a significant hazards considerations.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Portland State UniversityLibrary, 731 S.W. Harrison Street, Portland, Oregon 97207 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Leonard A. Girard, Esq., Portland GeneralElectric Company, 121 S.W. Salmon Street, Portland, Oregon 97204 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Portland General Electric Company et al., Docket No. 50-344, TrojanNuclear Plant, Columbia County, Oregon </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 12, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Trojan Technical Specification (TS) Tables 3.3-3, ``Engineered SafetyFeatures Actuation System Instrumentation,'' and 3.3-9, ``Remote ShutdownMonitoring Instrumentation'' by renaming the shutdown panel outside ofthe control room from ``C-160 Panel'' (located in the Turbine Building)to ``Remote Shutdown Station.'' This change is necessitated due to theremoval of the C-160 panel from its present location, and the installationof its upgraded replacement at a different portion of the plant. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>10 CFR 50.92 states that a proposed amendment will not involve a significanthazards consideration if the proposed amendment does not: (i) involve asignificant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated; or (ii) create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (iii) involvea significant reduction in a margin of safety. The Commission has alsoprovided guidance concerning the application of these standards by providingcertain examples (March 6, 1986, 51 FR 7751). An example of an amendmentthat is considered not likely to involve a significant hazards considerationis Example (i) is a purely administrative change to Technical Specifications:for example, a change to achieve consistency throughout the technical specification,correction of an error, or a change in nomenclature. The proposed change involves the renaming of the shutdown panel outsideof the control room, and eliminates the reference to its location. Thesurveillance and operability requirements of the remote shutdown panelas applied to the upgraded replacement remote shutdown panel remain unchanged.The proposed change is editorial in nature and is considered to fall withinthe scope of the Commission's Example (i) cited above. As such, the staff proposes to determine that the requested change doesnot involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Portland State UniversityLibrary, 731 S.W. Harrison Street, Portland, Oregon 97207 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Leonard A. Girard, Esq., Portland GeneralElectric Company, 121 S.W. Salmon Street, Portland, Oregon 97204 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Power Authority of The State of New York, Docket No. 50-286, IndianPoint Nuclear Generating Unit No. 3, Westchester County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 15, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The licensee has provided thefollowing description of the changes to the Technical Specifications: The existing Technical Specification 3.4.A requires that all the twentyASME code approved main steam line safety valves be operable when the RCStemperature is above 350anddegrees; F. The allowable out of service timefor these safety valves is 48 hours. The proposed revision to TechnicalSpecification 3.4.A and its associated Basis would allow plant operationwith up to three inoperable main steam line safety valves per steam lineprovided the power range neutron flux high setpoint is reduced per Table3.4-1 There are five safety valves on each steam line; one 8 inch valve and four10 inch valves. The relief capacities for the individual valves range from540,000 to 823,000 1bm/hr. The total relieving capacity at full power is3,777,000 1bm/hr per steam generator or 15,108,000 1bm/hr through all 20valves. The total full power steam flow is 12,974,500 1bm/hr. Therefore,the total relieving of the 20 valves is 116% of the total secondary steamflow at 100% rated power (3025 Mwt). The existing and proposed Technical Specifications ensure compliance withthe ASME Code requirement on steam generators having 110% design steamflow rate relief capability. In order to satisfy the relief capabilityrequirement during plant operations with inoperable safety valves, thetotal steam flow is reduced by decreasing the power level. The reductionin power level is ensured by reducing the power range neutron flux highsetpoint. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with a proposed amendment wouldnot: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) Create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee made the following analysis of these changes: 1. Does the proposed license amendment involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? Theproposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor the consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The ASME Coderequires that the steam generators have the capability to remove 110% ofthe design steam flow rate. The Loss of External Electrical Load Transientposes the greatest challenge to the main steam line safety valves. Theworst case Loss of Load Transient analyzed in the FSAR results in the reliefof 69% of the steam flow at 100% rated power. The reduction in power levelcompensates for the reduction in steam relief capability with inoperablemain steam safety valves. The ASME relief capability requirements are satisfiedby reducing the power range neutron flux high setpoint per Technical SpecificationTable 3.4-1. The proposed license amendment does not involve a significantincrease in the consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. Does the proposed license amendment create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? Theproposed amendment involves a reduction in operating power level in orderto compensate for a reduction in steam relief capability posed by inoperablesafety valves. Plant operations at a reduced power level does not createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from an accidentpreviously evaluated. The transients analyzed in the FSAR bound plant operationsat a reduced power level. 3. Does the proposed amendment involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety? As the reduction in power dictated by Table 3.4-1 compensatesfor the reduction in relief capability posed by the inoperable safety valves,the margin of safety is maintained. Therefore, the proposed amendment doesnot involve a reduction in a margin of safety. Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed changesdo not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10601. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Charles M. Pratt, 10 Columbus Circle,New York, New York 10019. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Toledo Edison Company and The Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company,Docket No. 50-346, Davis-Besse Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 1, OttawaCounty, Ohio </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 22, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TS's) relating to organization, bothwith respect to offsite and facility (onsite) staff. Specifically, theproposed amendment would delete Figures 6.2-1 and 6.2-2 from TS Section6.2. In addition, TS Section 6.2.1 would be modified to include certainaspects of organization which are important to safety and must be includedin the TS's. These include requirements that lines of authority, responsibility,and communications be established and documented; assignment of corporateand operational responsibility and authority; and provisions for independencefrom operational pressure for certain operating staff. TS Section 6.2.2would be modified to specify that the Assistant Plant Manager for Operationsand the Operations Superintendent shall hold senior reactor operator licenses.The proposed changes are in accordance with the guidance provided in NRCGeneric Letter 88-06. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission's regulationsin 10 CFR 50.92, this means that the operation of the facility in accordancewith the proposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The Commission has evaluated the proposed changes against the above standardsas required by 10 CFR 50.91(a) and has made a proposed determination that:A. The proposed changes would not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated becausethe proposed changes would not modify any accident conditions or assumptions.The proposed changes meet the requirements of 10 CFR 50.36 by providingfor the organization and management to ensure safe operation of the facility.B. The proposed changes would not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated because the proposedchanges would not affect any system, equipment, or procedure. The organizationcharts would be replaced with general requirements that include the essenceof the organizational structure in the TS's. C. The changes would not involve a significant reduction in a margin ofsafety because the proposed changes would not affect any operating practices,limits or equipment important to safety. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of Toledo Library,Documents Department, 2801 Bancroft Avenue, Toledo, Ohio 43606. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Kenneth E. Perkins. <ITAG tagnum="84">Union Electric Company, Docket No. 50-483, Callaway Plant, Unit 1,Callaway County, Missouri </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 21, 1986 and November 17,1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>In accordance with the requirementsof 10 CFR 73.55, the licensee submitted an amendment to the Physical SecurityPlan for the Callaway Plant to reflect recent changes to that regulation.The proposed amendment would modify paragraph 2.E of Facility OperatingLicense No. NPF-30 to require compliance with the revised Plan. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>On August 4, 1986 (51 FR 27817 and 27822), the Nuclear RegulatoryCommission amended Part 73 of its regulations, ``Physical Protection ofPlants and Materials,'' to clarify plant security requirements to affordan increased assurance of plant safety. The amended regulations requiredthat each nuclear power reactor licensee submit proposed amendments toits security plan to implement the revised provisions of 10 CFR 73.55.The licensee submitted its revised plan on November 21, 1986, and November17, 1987, to satisfy the requirements of the amended regulations. The Commissionproposes to amend the license to reference the revised plan. In the Supplementary Materials accompanying the amended regulations, theCommission indicated that it was amending its regulations ``to providea more safety conscious safeguards system while maintaining the currentlevels of protection'' and that the ``Commission believes that the clarificationand refinement of requirements as reflected in these amendments is appropriatebecause they afford an increased assurance of plant safety.'' The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thecriteria for determining whether a significant hazards consideration existsby providing certain examples of actions involving no significant hazardsconsiderations and examples of actions involving significant hazards considerations(51 FR 7750). One of these examples of actions involving no significanthazards considerations is example (vii) ``a change to conform a licenseto changes in the regulations, where the license change results in veryminor changes to facility operations clearly in keeping with the regulations.''The changes in this case fall within the scope of the example. For theforegoing reasons, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposedamendment involves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Callaway County Public Library,710 Court Street, Fulton, Missouri 65251 and the John M. Olin Library,Washington University, Skinker and Lindell Boulevards, St. Louis, Missouri63130. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsandamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Kenneth E. Perkins. <ITAG tagnum="84">Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-271, VermontYankee Nuclear Power Station, Vernon, Vermont </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 2, 1986, October 9,1987 and March 16, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>In accordance with the requirementsof 10 CFR 73.55, the licensee submitted an amendment to the Physical SecurityPlan for the Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Station to reflect recent changesto that regulation. The proposed amendment would modify paragraphs 3.G.and 3.H. of Facility Operating License No. DPR-28 to require compliancewith the revised Plan. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>On August 4, 1986 (51 FR 27817 and 27822), the Nuclear RegulatoryCommission amended Part 73 of its regulations, ``Physical Protection ofPlants and Materials,'' to clarify plant security requirements to affordan increased assurance of plant safety. The amended regulations requiredthat each nuclear power reactor licensee submit proposed amendments toits security plan to implement the revised provisions of 10 CFR 73.55.The licensee submitted its revised plan on March 16, 1988, to satisfy therequirements of the amended regulations. The Commission proposes to amendthe license to reference the revised plan. In the Supplementary Materials accompanying the amended regulations, theCommission indicated that it was amending its regulations ``to providea more safety conscious safeguards system while maintaining the currentlevels of protection'' and that the ``Commission believes that the clarificationand refinement of requirements as reflected in these amendments is appropriatebecause they afford an increased assurance of plant safety.'' The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thecriteria for determining whether a significant hazards consideration existsby providing certain examples of actions involving no significant hazardsconsiderations and examples of actions involving significant hazards considerations(51 FR 7750). One of these examples of actions involving no significanthazards consideration is example (vii) ``a change to conform a licenseto changes in the regulations, where the license change results in veryminor changes to facility operations clearly in keeping with the regulations.''The changes in this case fall within the scope of the example. For theforegoing reasons, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposedamendment involves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>Brooks Memorial Library,224 Main Street, Brattleboro, Vermont 05301. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>John A Ritscher, Esq., Ropes andamp; Gray,225 Franklin Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02110. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Richard H. Wessman, Director <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket No. 50-338, North AnnaPower Station, Unit No. 1, Louisa County, Virginia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 14, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed changes would allowthe widening of the axial flux difference bands from the current andCx.207;andplusmin;5%about a target value to +6% to -15% at 100% power and +20% to -28% at 50%power. The proposed changes would provide additional operating flexibilityduring return to power after trips near the end of the NA-1 Cycle No. 7.The proposed changes for NA-1 have already been approved for NA-2 by AmendmentNo. 64 to Facility Operating License NPF-7 issued April 14, 1986. The heat flux hot channel factor (FQ) operating limit specified in theNA-1andamp;2 Technical Specifications (TS) is established by LOCA/ECCS analysesperformed in accordance with 10 CFR 50, Appendix K. These analyses showthat if the FQ limit is not exceeded, the predicted LOCA peak clad temperaturewill not exceed the 2200anddegrees; F limit specified in the Final ECCS AcceptanceCriteria. The TS also establish the required method for verification thatthe actual peaking factor realized during operation will not exceed theaxially dependent peaking factor (FQ(Z)) limit. This verification is currentlyperformed by combining the axially dependent radial peaking factor, Fxy(Z),which is determined by periodic surveillance with the core flux monitoringsystem, with an analytically determined axial peaking factor (PZ(Z)). Thedetermination of PZ(Z) involves evaluating various plant operating maneuverssuch as load following. During Constant Axial Offset Control (CAOC) operation,the measured core axial flux difference (AFD) is maintained within a fixedband (+ or - 5%) of a target value. The target AFD is established by equilibriumoperating conditions. The proposed changes will replace the CAOC AFD limits with a set of limitsestablished by the Relaxed Power Distribution Control (RPDC) methodologydiscussed in the licensee's report entitled, ``Relaxed Power DistributionControl Methodology and Associated FQ Surveillance Technical Specifications''dated March 1986. These changes, as noted above, have already been approvedfor NA-2. The important feature of the RPDC strategy is that, instead ofanalytically verifying the peaking factor (FQ) margin for a fixed AFD limitband, the AFD band is varied until the available FQ margin is utilized.Because a wider range of axial shapes can be realized under normal RPDCoperation, additional analyses must be performed to verify that the overtemperaturedelta-T (OTDT) and overpower delta-T (OPDT) trips continue to provide adequateDNB and local overpower (high kw/ft) protection over the entire range ofanticipated Condition II events. In addition, the shapes are evaluatedas potential preconditions for the complete loss of flow accident, to ensurethat no DNB violations would occur during the bounding, non-OTDT-protectionaccident. The methodology for performing this verification is discussedin further detail in the licensee's RPDC report. Additionally, the current requirement for monitoring the axially dependentradial peaking factor, Fxy(Z), is being replaced by a requirement to monitorthe total peaking factor FQ(Z). This is accomplished by taking a full coreflux map under equilibrium conditions and increasing the measured valueby appropriate factors to account for manufacturing tolerances and measurementuncertainties. Finally, since FQ(Z) is measured under equilibrium conditions,a nonequilibrium factor, N(Z), is applied. N(Z) accounts for the maximumpotential increase in local peaking which could occur during transient,nonequilibrium operation. In accounting for transient effects, N(Z) thushas a function which is similar to PZ(Z) in the current approach. The differenceis that where P(Z) is a nonequilibrium axial peaking factor, N(Z) envelopesthe potential equilibrium-to-nonequilibrium FQ increase and accounts forboth axial and radial zenon and power redistribution effects. The licensee has performed a detailed review of the impact of operationwith relaxed power distribution control/FQ surveillance on the variousaccident scenarios discussed in Chapter 15 of the NA-1andamp;2 UFSAR. Specifically,the impact of the wider axial flux difference on key safety parameterswhich could influence accident analysis results has been assessed. Amongthose parameters considered are: trip reactivity, both total value andreactivity as a function of rod insertion; shutdown margin; reactivityinsertion rates due to rod withdrawal from subcritical and at power; androd worths and/or peaking factors for ejected, dropped or misaligned controlrods. The NA-1 Cycle 7 reload core design has been evaluated for operation underthe proposed RPDC TS in accordance with the licensee's RPDC methodology.The analysis included examination of the LOCA and complete Loss of FlowAccident (LOFA) preconditions, the peak linear power (kw/ft), the overtemperaturedelta-T f(delta-I) function and the fuel rod design criteria. The appropriateCore Surveillance Report and AFD limits were also generated. These analysesassumed implementation after 3000 MWD/MTU burnup; the analyses for subsequentcycles will support RPDC operation throughout the entire cycle. The analysisresults yielded two conclusions: (1) none of the normal operation conditionsallowed by RPDC were found to violate the key safety criteria, and (2)all of the Condition II events examined in the Final Safety Analysis Report(FSAR) were shown to yield acceptable results when initiated from any ofthese normal operation conditions. The RPDC bands were thus found to bean acceptable operating space. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposedchanges would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes involve only a relaxationof the limits in axial power distribution skewing which has been previouslyreviewed and approved by the NRC staff for application to NA-2. Furthermore,the approved RPDC analysis procedures and continued application of currentreload design and safety analysis methodology will ensure that the UFSARaccident analyses remain bounding. 2. Involve any alterations to the physical plant which introduce any newor unique operational modes or accident precursors. Thus, the possibilityfor an accident or malfunction of a different type than any evaluated previouslyin the safety analysis report is not being created by these proposed changes.3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. While a relaxationof the axial offset operating limits is realized, the margin of safetyas defined in the basis for any Technical Specification is not reducedby these proposed changes; the margins of safety are preserved by the impositionof a frequent FQ surveillance requirement, by effectively reducing thelimit on measured equilibrium FQ by a conservative nonequilibrium factor,N(Z), and by reload verifications of the DNB, linear power and clad integritycriteria. Therefore, the proposed changes meet the criteria specified in 10 CFR Part50.92(c) and, thus, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the proposedchanges involve no significant hazards considerations, and that operationof the facility in accordance with the proposed changes would not involvesignificant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>The Alderman Library, ManuscriptsDepartment, University of Virginia, Charlottesville, Virginia 22901. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael W. Maupin, Esq., Hunton and Williams,P.O. Box 1535, Richmond, Virginia 23212. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-338 and 50-339,North Anna Power Station, Units No. 1 and No. 2, Louisa County, Virginia</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 30, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed changes to theNA-1andamp;2 Technical Specifications (TS) would add incore thermocouplesin the Accident Monitoring Instrumentation specified in Tables 3.3-10 and4.3-7. The proposed changes are in accordance with the requirements ofNUREG-0737, Item II.F.2, ``Instrumentation for Detection of InadequateCore Cooling,'' and NRC Generic Letter 83-37, ``NUREG-0737 Technical Specifications.''Specifically, the proposed changes would add incore thermocouples to theNA-1andamp;2 TS Table 3.3-10, Accident Monitoring Instrumentation and requirefour thermocouples per core quadrant for operability determination whileallowing two thermocouples per quadrant as the minimum number of operablechannels for operation. Also, the incore thermocouples would be added tothe NA-1andamp;2 TS Table 4.3-7, Accident Monitoring Instrumentation SurveillanceRequirements, requiring a ``Channel Check'' on a monthly basis and a ``ChannelCalibration'' at each refueling. These changes conform to the NRC sampleas provided in Enclosure 3 to Generic Letter 83-37, pages 15 and 16. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR Part 50.92(c). A proposedamendment to an operating license for a facility involves no significanthazards considerations if operation of the facility in accordance withthe proposed amendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or(2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The proposed changes would not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequence[s]of an accident previously evaluated, because the change[s] will requireadditional controls and surveillances in the operation of [NA-1andamp;2]and [are] in accordance with Generic Letter 83-37 and NUREG-0737. The operabilityrequirements and the surveillance requirements for the accident monitoringinstrumentation have not been decreased by [these] change[s]. (2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously identified, because the change[s] will requireadditional controls and surveillances in the operation of [NA-1andamp;2]and [are] in accordance with Generic Letter 83-37 and NUREG-0737. The proposedchange[s] [do] not involve any alterations to plant equipment or procedureswhich would introduce any new or unique operational modes or accident precursors.(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety, because thechange[s] will require additional controls and surveillances in the operationof [NA-1andamp;2] and [are] in accordance with Generic Letter 83-37 and NUREG-0737.The results of the accident analyses performed in the UFSAR will continueto bound operation. Therefore, the proposed changes meet the criteria specified in 10 CFR 50.92(c)and, thus, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the proposed changesinvolve no significant hazards considerations, and that operation of thefacilities in accordance with the proposed changes would not involve significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Board of Supervisors Office,Louisa County Courthouse, Louisa, Virginia 23093 and the Alderman Library,Manuscripts Department, University of Virginia, Charlottesville, Virginia22901. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael W. Maupin, Esq., Hunton and Williams,P.O. Box 1535, Richmond, Virginia 23212. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>December 11, 1986, October 16, 1987and February 24, 1988. <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>In accordance with the requirementsof 10 CFR 73.55, the Virginia Electric and Power Company submitted amendmentsto the Physical Security Plan for the Surry Power Station, Units No. 1and No. 2 to reflect recent changes to that regulation. The proposed amendmentswould modify paragraph 3.J of Facility Operating Licenses No. DPR-32 andDPR-37 to require compliance with the revised Plan. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>On August 4, 1986 (51 FR 27817 and 27822), the Nuclear RegulatoryCommission amended Part 73 of its regulations, ``Physical Protection ofPlants and Materials,'' to clarify plant security requirements to affordan increased assurance of plant safety. The amended regulations requiredthat each nuclear power reactor licensee submit proposed amendments toits security plan to implement the revised provisions of 10 CFR 73.55.The licensee submitted its revised Plan on December 11, 1986, October 16,1987 and February 24, 1988, to satisfy the requirements of the amendedregulations. The Commission proposes to amend the licenses to referencethe revised Plan. In the Supplementary Materials accompanying the amended regulations, theCommission indicated that it was amending its regulations ``to providea more safety conscious safeguards system while maintaining the currentlevels of protection'' and that the ``Commission believes that the clarificationand refinement of requirements as reflected in these amendments is appropriatebecause they afford an increased assurance of plant safety.'' The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thecriteria for determining whether a significant hazards consideration existsby providing certain examples of actions involving no significant hazardsconsiderations and example of actions involving significant hazards considerations(51 FR 7750). One of these examples of actions involving no significanthazards considerations is example (vii), ``a change to conform a licenseto changes in the regulations, where the license change results in veryminor changes to facility operations clearly in keeping with the regulations.''The changes in this case fall within the scope of the example. For theforegoing reasons, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposedamendments involve no significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Michael W. Maupin, Hunton and Williams,Post Office Box 1535, Richmond, Virginia 23213. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>March 30, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The proposed change would clarifyTechnical Specification (TS) 6.5.B.7, ``Station Operating Records'' forSurry Units 1 and 2. Currently, TS 6.5.B.7 requires that the primary recordsof inservice inspections performed, including photographs of the surfaceof those welds inspected by a visual or surface examination, be retainedduring the life of the plant. The proposed change would clarify the requirementto retain the radiographs and photographs when taken pursuant to the requirementsof Section XI of the ASME Code. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has reviewed the proposed change in accordance with the requirementsof 10 CFR 50.92 and has determined that the request does not involve significanthazards considerations. The licensee's analysis is provided below. <ITAG tagnum="21">This proposed change to the Surry Technical Specifications has beenreviewed pursuant to the requirements of 10 CFR 50.92 and it has been determinedthat a significant safety hazard is not created. Specifically, the operationof Surry Power Station with the proposed amendment[s] will not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The proposed amendment[s] [do] notaffect plant operation nor [do they] alter the requirements for inserviceinspection methods, scope, or frequency. Only the requirements for retainingrecords are clarified in [these] amendment[s]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. The proposed amendment[s] [do] not affectthe material or physical condition of the station systems, structures orcomponents. There is no new or different kind of accident created sincethe amendment[s] [are] a clarification of previous requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposedamendment[s] [do] not affect the margin of safety since there is no reductionin the requirements to conduct an inservice inspection program in accordancewith the ASME Section XI Code, the augmented inspection requirements ofthe Technical Specification and the ASLB decisions. </ITAG>After a preliminary review of the licensee's analysis, the staff agreeswith the licensee's conclusions as stated above. Therefore, the staff proposesto determine that the proposed amendments do not involve significant hazardsconsiderations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Michael W. Maupin, Hunton and Williams,Post Office Box 1535, Richmond, Virginia 23213. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Yankee Atomic Electric Company Docket No. 50-029 Yankee Nuclear PowerStation, Franklin County, Massachusetts </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 4, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldmake the battery charger output Technical Specification for Charger No.3 the same as for chargers No. 1 and No. 2. This is a result of the plannedreplacement of old Battery No. 3 with a new upgraded battery. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee's analyses contained in the April 4, 1988 letter states thefollowing: <ITAG tagnum="21">This change has been evaluated and determined to involve a no significanthazards consideration. As such, this proposed change does not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The new upgraded battery and charger perform the same function asthe present components. The new battery has added capability to power allthe existing dc loads and future loads, if needed. The new charger hasadequate capability to power normal dc loads and fully recharge the newbattery, from a complete discharge state, within an acceptable time. Theinstallation of an upgraded Battery No. 3 and charger adds further assurancethat this equipment will perform as designed and thus does not involvea significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The installation of an upgraded Battery No. 3 and charger will enhancethe capability of the DC System, since on a loss of ac all safety and nonsafetydc loads could be powered for a substantially longer time. The impact ofthe new larger charger on the existing AC System has been evaluated andfound within the acceptable limits. The change of the new charger's powersupply enhances the redundancy of the DC System in that each battery chargerwill be fed from an independent power source. The installation of an upgradedBattery No. 3 and charger will enhance the capability of the 125 V dc BusNo. 3 to perform its functions and thus does not create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The new battery and charger perform the same function as the presentcomponents, and their capabilities are substantially higher than the presentequipment. Since this proposed change will result in an increase in thesize and capability of Battery No. 3 and charger, it does not involve asignificant reduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG>Based on the considerations contained herein, it is concluded that thereis reasonable assurance that operation of the Yankee plant, consistentwith the proposed Technical Specifications, will not endanger the healthand safety of the public. This proposed change has been reviewed by theNuclear Safety Audit and Review Committee. The staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and agrees with it. Therefore,we conclude that the amendment satisfies the three criteria listed in 10CFR 50.92. Based on that conclusion the staff proposes to make no significanthazards consideration determination. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Greenfield Community College,1 College Drive, Greenfield, Massachusetts 01301. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Thomas Dignan, Esquire, Ropes and Gray,225 Franklin Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02110. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Richard H. Wessman <ITAG tagnum="94"/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">PREVIOUSLY PUBLISHED NOTICES OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENTSTO OPERATING LICENSES AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATIONDETERMINATION AND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING</ITAG>The following notices were previously published as separate individualnotices. The notice content was the same as above. They were publishedas individual notices either because time did not allow the Commissionto wait for this biweekly notice or because the action involved exigentcircumstances. They are repeated here because the biweekly notice listsall amendments issued or proposed to be issued involving no significanthazards consideration. For details, see the individual notice in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on the day and page cited. This notice does notextend the notice period of the original notice. <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-341, Fermi-2, Monroe County,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 20, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The proposed license amendmentwould change Technical Specification Table 4.3.1.1-1, ``Reactor ProtectionSystem Instrumentation Surveillance Requirements,'' to delete the DailyChannel Check requirements of Note (g) for the Average Power Range MonitorFlow Biased Neutron Flux - High Scram Functional Unit. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 29, 1988 (53 FR 15476) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 31, 1988 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,3700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 48161. <ITAG tagnum="84">Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-387 and 50-388Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Units 1 and 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 8, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendmentwould delete reference to recirculation fans 2V418 Aandamp;B and fan associatedbreakers, and add fans 2V415 Aandamp;B and the associated breakers to theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 15, 1988 (53 FR 12625) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 16, 1988 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Osterhout Free Library, ReferenceDepartment, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701.<ITAG tagnum="94"/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE</ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application complies with the standardsand requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriatefindings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulationsin 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility OperatingLicense and Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determinationand Opportunity for Hearing in connection with these actions was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>as indicated. No request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene was filed following this notice. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationsfor amendments, (2) the amendments, and (3) the Commission's related letters,Safety Evaluations and/or Environmental Assessments as indicated. All ofthese items are available for public inspection at the Commission's PublicDocument Room, 1717 H Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the local publicdocument rooms for the particular facilities involved. A copy of items(2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to the U.S. NuclearRegulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director, Divisionof Reactor Projects. <ITAG tagnum="84">Arizona Public Service Company, et al., Docket No. STN 50-528, PaloVerde Nuclear Generating Station, Unit 1, Maricopa County, Arizona </ITAG><T3>Dates of application for amendment: </T3>January 21, and February 2,1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises Specification3/4.4.8.3 to add a footnote to the applicability of the Specification forRCS temperatures between 255anddegrees; F and 295anddegrees; F. The amendmentalso clarifies the surveillance requirements and bases section for Specification4.11.2.5 dealing with the monitoring of hydrogen and oxygen gases in thewaste gas holdup system and with the automatic control features of thesystem. These changes make those Specifications consistent with the currentSpecifications for Palo Verde, Units 2 and 3. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 5, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 5, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>31 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-41: </T3>Amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 9, 1988 (53 FR 7585). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 5, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Phoenix Public Library, Businessand Science Division, 12 East McDowell Road, Phoenix, Arizona 85004 <ITAG tagnum="84">Arizona Public Service Company, et al., Docket No. STN 50-529, PaloVerde Nuclear Generating Station, Unit 2, Maricopa County, Arizona </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 3, 1987, and supplementaldocuments dated December 2, 1987 and February 4, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises severalportions of the Technical Specifications to incorporate changes in supportof Cycle 2 operation. One of the proposed changes to the Technical Specificationsin the amendment request, relating to Azimuthal tilt limits, is still underreview. The completion of review for this request, which is not requiredfor restart of Palo Verde, Unit 2, is pending on receipt of the additionalinformation. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 5, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 5, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>19 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-51: </T3>Amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>January 27, 1988 (53 FR 2307). The supplementalletters did not change the initial proposed determination of no significanthazards consideration. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 5, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Phoenix Public Library, Businessand Science Division, 12 East McDowell Road, Phoenix, Arizona 85004 <ITAG tagnum="84">Baltimore Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-317 and 50-318,Calvert Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Calvert County,Maryland </ITAG><T3>Date of applications for amendments: </T3>October 1, 1986 and January22, 1987, as supplemented on February 16, and February 26, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments (1) Modify theUnit 1 TS Limiting Condition For Operation 3.3.3.2 for incore detectorsby placing additional restrictions upon operability above those that wererequired for operation duiring the previous cycle (Cycle 8); (2) Changethe surveillance periods of the Units 1 and 2 TS Surveillane Requirements(SRs) 4.1.3.4.c (demonstration of full length control element assemblydrop time) and 4.3.3.2.b (incore detector channel calibration) from atleast once per 18 months to at least once per refueling interval, wherea refuleing interval shall be defined as 24 months; (3) Modify the Units1 and 2 TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.f.3 for cycling fire suppression water systemflow path valves that are not testable during plant operation; and 4.7.11.4.b,for the inspection, reracking and replacement of degraded coupling gasketsfor fire hoses inside containment, by extending their associated surveillanceintervals from at least once every 18 months to at least once per refuelinginterval (24 months); (4) Renumber the Units 1 and 2 TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.f.3as 4.7.11.1.1.g(2); TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.g as 4.7.11.1.1.g(1); and TS SR 4.7.11.1.1.f.4as 4.7.11.1.1.f.3 and change the Units 1 and 2 TS SRs 4.7.11.1.1.g (firesuppression system flow test), 4.7.11.2.b and c (spray and sprinkler systemfunctional test), and 4.7.11.4.c (containment fire hose stations operabilityand hydrostatic tests) by making administrative changes and more restrictivechanges to the surveillance requirements; and (5) Change the Units 1 and2 TS SR 4.4.10.1.2, ``Augmented Inservice Inspection Program for Main Steamand Main Feedwater Piping,'' to update the required ASME Boiler and PressureVessel Code, Section XI, for Class 2 components, from the 1974 Editionwith Addenda through Summer 1975 to the 1983 Edition with Addenda throughSummer 1983. In addition TS SR 4.4.10.1.2.a would be deleted and TS SR4.4.10.1.2.b would be renumbered as 4.4.10.1.2 and would be clarified toreflect a new 10-year inservice inspection interval. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 3, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 3, 1988 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>129 and 111 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-53 and DPR-69. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>January 28, 1987 (52 FR 2870) and January 13,1988 (53 FR 819) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentsis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 3, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Calvert County Library, PrinceFrederick, Maryland. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, Docket No. 50-261, H. B. RobinsonSteam Electric Plant, Unit No. 2, Darlington County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 20, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment changes TechnicalSpecification (TS) Section 6.5.1.6.5 to increase the quorum requirementof the Plant Nuclear Safety Committee. It also includes editorial changesin TS Section 6.7.1. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Amendment No. 117</T3> <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-23. </T3>Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 24, 1988 (53 FR 5488) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Hartsville Memorial Library,Home and Fifth Avenues, Hartsville, South Carolina 29535 <ITAG tagnum="84">Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket No. 50-247, IndianPoint Nuclear Generating Unit No. 2, Westchester County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>February 14, 1983, as supplementedOctober 29, 1984, August 14, 1985, and January 3, 1986. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications concerning refueling. The change consists of distributingthe original specifications into three groups which apply to plant conditionssignificant to movement of heavy loads. In addition, requirements are addedconcerning the availability of the RHR pumps and heat exchangers when fuelis in the reactor vessel and the reactor head bolts are less than fullytensioned. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 3, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 3, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>130 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-26: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>September 21, 1983 (48 FR 43133) and renoticedOctober 9, 1985 (50 FR 41246) and March 26, 1986 (51 FR 10455). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 3, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10610. <ITAG tagnum="84">Duquesne Light Company, Docket No. 50-334, Beaver Valley Power Station,Unit No. 1, Shippingport, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>November 12, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications to impose revised and additional requirements on reactorcoolant system pressure isolation valves, in accordance with the staff'sGeneric Letter 87-06. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Amendment No. </T3>124 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-66. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 28, 1987 (52 FR 48892) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>B. F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power and Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-335 and 50-389,St. Lucie Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, St. Lucie County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 22, 1988, as supplementedApril 20, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendment replaced the organizationcharts in the Technical Specifications with more general organizationalrequirements. Various title changes were also made to the Company NuclearReview Board members. A Technical Specification was added which requiredthe Operations Supervisor to hold a Senior Reactor Operator license. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Effective Date: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>93 and 29 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-67 and NPF-16: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9503) Additional informationwas submitted by letted dated April 20, 1988. The additional informationdid not change, in any way, the staff's initial proposed determinationof no significant hazards consideration. The Commission's related evaluationof the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April 28, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Indian River Junior CollegeLibrary, 3209 Virgina Avenue, Ft. Pierce, Florida 33450. <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-250 and 50-251, TurkeyPoint Plant Units 3 and 4, Dade County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>April 16, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments deleted theremaining Sections 1.0 and 5.0 of the Turkey Point Plant EnvironmentalTechnical Specifications and replaced them with an Environmental ProtectionPlan, which is incorporated by reference in the licenses. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Amendment Nos. </T3>128 and 122 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-31 and DPR-41: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 26, 1987 (52 FR 32202) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in an Environmental Assessmentdated April 21, 1988 (53 FR 13204) and in a Safety Evaluation dated April25, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Environmental and Urban AffairsLibrary, Florida International University, Miami, Florida 33199. <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-250 and 50-251, TurkeyPoint Plant Units 3 and 4, Dade County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 19, 1988, as supplementedApril 22, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments replaced theorganization charts in the Technical Specifications with more general organizationalrequirements. In addition, several other changes to Section 6 were made.Those include: changing references of ``Vice President-Nuclear Operations''or ``Group Vice President-Nuclear Energy'' to ``Senior Vice President-Nuclear''in six different places in the TS; clarification of ``immediate'' writtennotification to mean ``within 24 hours'' for a specific action identified;and finally, revision of the TS pertaining to the Company Nuclear ReviewBoard (CNRB) to change one membership from ``Chairman: Group Vice President- Nuclear Energy'' to ``Senior Vice President - Nuclear''; to change anothermembership from ``Vice President - Nuclear Operations'' to ``Vice President- Nuclear Energy''; to change a third membership from ``Senior ProjectManager - Power Plant Engineering'' to ``Manager - Power Plant Engineering'';and to not require a vice-president to be the CNRB chairman. By letterdated April 22, 1988, the licensee withdrew a portion of their originalrequest related to the deletion of the requirement for the Operations Superintendentto be a licensed Senior Reactor Operator. This will be further addressedunder separate correspondence. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Amendment Nos. </T3>129 and 123 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-31 and DPR-41: </T3>Amendmentsrevise the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9504). The licensee'sletter dated April 22, 1988 provided supplemental information which didnot alter the staff's no significant hazards consideration determination.The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated April 28, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Environmental and Urban AffairsLibrary, Florida International University, Miami, Florida 33199. <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-250 and 50-251, TurkeyPoint Plant Units 3 and 4, Dade County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>April 4, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendment revised Section3.4.4 of the Technical Specifications related to the component coolingwater system. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 29, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 29, 1988 <T3>Amendment Nos. </T3>130 and 124 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-31 and DPR-41: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration:</T3>Yes (53 FR 12203 dated April 13, 1988). That notice provided an opportunityto submit comments on the Commission's proposed no significant hazardsconsideration determination. No comments have been received. The noticealso provided for an opportunity to request a hearing by May 13, 1988,but indicated that if the Commission makes a final no significant hazardsconsideration determination any such hearing would take place after issuanceof the amendments. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated April 29, 1988. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Environmental and Urban AffairsLibrary, Florida International University, Miami, Florida 33199. <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-321, EdwinI. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Unit 1, Appling County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 21, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment modified the TechnicalSpecifications to require full stroke testing of the main steam isolationvalves in accordance with the ASME Code, Section XI. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 2, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 2, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>153 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-57: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 9, 1988 (53 FR 7592) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 2, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Appling County Public Library,301 City Hall Drive, Baxley, Georgia 31513 <ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile IslandNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 12, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>Revises Technical Specificationsto allow storage of new reactor fuel with enrichments up to and including4.3 weight percent U-235. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3> April 25, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>138 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-50. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9505) The Commission'srelated evaluation of this amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. <ITAG tagnum="84">Gulf States Utilities Company, Docket No. 50-458, River Bend Station,Unit 1 West Feliciana Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 11, 1986 and November 6, 1987<T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment modified paragraph2.D of the license to require compliance with the amended Physical SecurityPlan. This Plan was amended to conform to the requirements of 10 CFR 73.55.Consistent with the provisions of 10 CFR 73.55, search requirements mustbe implemented within 60 days and miscellaneous amendments within 180 daysfrom the effective date of this amendment. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 26, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>21 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-47. </T3>The amendment revised theLicense. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9506) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 26, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Documents Department,Louisiana State University, Baton Rouge, Louisiana 70803 <ITAG tagnum="84">Maine Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-309, Maine YankeeAtomic Power Station, Lincoln County Maine </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>March 1, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>Revises the Technical Specificationsto update Figure 5.2-1 and Figure 5.2-2 in Technical Specification 5.2``Organizational'' to reflect a successional change in the offsite corporateorganization and associated changes in the functional reporting structure.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 26, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>104 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-36. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9507) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 26, 1988. <T3>No signficant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Wiscasset Public Library,High Street, P.O. Box 367, Wiscasset, Maine 04578. <ITAG tagnum="84">Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper NuclearStation, Nemaha County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 16, 1987 as supplemented by lettersdated November 3, 1987 and January 18, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed LicenseCondition Paragraph 2.C.3 to require compliance with the amended PhysicalSecurity Plan as amended to incorporate the requirements of 10 CFR 73.55.Consistent with the provisions of 73.55, search requirements must be implementedwithin 60 days and miscellaneous amendments within 180 days from the effectivedate of this amendment. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>119 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-46. </T3>Amendment revised the license.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9508) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aletter to Nebraska Public Power District dated April 25, 1988 and a SafeguardsEvaluation Report dated April 25, 1988. <T3>No siginificant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Auburn Public Library, 11815th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305. <ITAG tagnum="84">Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper NuclearStation, Nemaha County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 28, 1987, as modified by letterdated February 22, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes the TechnicalSpecifications to revise reactor vessel pressure-temperature limits forheatup and cooldown, normal operation, and pressure testing. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 26, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>120 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-46. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 2, 1987 (52 FR 45889) The February22, 1988 submittal provided additional clarifying information and did notchange the finding of the initial notice. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated April 26, 1988. <T3>No siginificant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Auburn Public Library, 11815th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305. <ITAG tagnum="84">Omaha Public Power District, Docket No. 50-285, Fort Calhoun Station,Unit No. 1, Washington County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>February 8, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment would allow thelicensee to use annual average (rather than real-time) meteorological dispersionfactors to calculate doses, and corrects and clarifies some parts of TechnicalSpecifications 2.9.1 and 5.9.4. However, the requested changes for removinginstantaneous release and removal of the radioactive effluent reports accordingto Regulatory Guide 1.21 was not approved by the staff. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 4, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>90 days from the date of issuance. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>113 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-40. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9509) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 4, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>W. Dale Clark Library, 215South 15th Street, Omaha, Nebraska 68102 <ITAG tagnum="84">Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-388 SusquehannaSteam Electric Station, Unit 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 23, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>Cycle 3 Reload changes to TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3> April 25, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Prior to startup for Cycle 3 operation <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>45 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-22. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications to support the fuel reload and Cycle 3 operations.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>January 27, 1988 (53 FR 2322) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Osterhout Free Library, ReferenceDepartment, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701.<ITAG tagnum="84">Portland General Electric Company, Docket No. 50-344, Trojan NuclearPlant, Columbia County, Oregon </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>February 4, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises TechnicalSpecifications Section 3/4.7.3, ``Component Cooling Water System'' to beconsistent with ``split-train'' operation. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 3, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 3, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>141 <T3>Facilities Operating License No. NPF-1: </T3>Amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9511). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 3, 1988. <T3>No Significant hazards consideration comments recieved: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Portland State UniversityLibrary, 731 S. W. Harrison St., Portland Oregon 97207 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Southern California Edison Company, et al., Docket No. 50-206, SanOnofre Nuclear Generating Station, Unit No. 1, San Diego County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 15, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the allowablecontrol rod drop time form 2.7 seconds to 2.44 seconds to be consistentwith the safety analysis for the facility. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>This license amendment is effective the date ofissuance and must be fully implemented no later than 30 days from dateof issuance. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>100 <T3>Provisional Operating License No. DPR-13. </T3>Amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9515) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 26, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No comments.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>General Library, Universityof California, Post Office Box 19557, Irvine, California 92713. <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-338 and50-339, North Anna Power Station, Units No. 1 and No. 2, Louisa County,Virginia </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>March 17, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revise the NA-1andamp;2TS, Section 6, Administrative Controls to reflect major reorganizationalchanges in the offsite and onsite corporate structure of Virginia Electricand Power Company. The changes (in total) are in conformance with eitherGeneric Letter 88-06 (Removal of Organizational Charts from Technical Specifications)or more closely with the most current version of the Westinghouse StandardTechnical Specifications, which appropriately apply to NA-1andamp;2. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>99 and 86 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-4 and NPF-7. </T3>Amendments revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 28, 1988 (53 FR 10005) The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room locations: </T3>Board of Supervisors Office,Louisa County Courthouse, Louisa, Virginia 23093, and the Alderman Library,Manuscripts Department, University of Virginia, Charlottesville, Virginia22901. <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia. </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>March 17, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revise the SurryUnits 1andamp;2 Technical Specifications, Section 6, Administrative Controlsto reflect major reorganizational changes in the offsite and onsite corporatestructure of Virginia Electric and Power Company. The changes (in total)are in conformance with Generic Letter 88-06 (Removal of OrganizationalCharts from Technical Specifications) and also with the most current versionof the Westinghouse Standard Technical Specifications, which appropriatelyapply to SPS-1andamp;2. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1988 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>119 and 119 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-32 and DPR-37: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 28, 1988 (53 FR 10003). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185 <T4>NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE AND FINALDETERMINATION OF NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION AND OPPORTUNITY FORHEARING (EXIGENT OR EMERGENCY CIRCUMSTANCES)</T4>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application for the amendment complieswith the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, asamended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commissionhas made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission'srules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the licenseamendment. Because of exigent or emergency circumstances associated with the datethe amendment was needed, there was not time for the Commission to publish,for public comment before issuance, its usual 30-day Notice of Considerationof Issuance of Amendment and Proposed No Significant Hazards ConsiderationDetermination and Opportunity for a Hearing. For exigent circumstances,the Commission has either issued a <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice providing opportunity for public commentor has used local media to provide notice to the public in the area surroundinga licensee's facility of the licensee's application and of the Commission'sproposed determination of no significant hazards consideration. The Commissionhas provided a reasonable opportunity for the public to comment, usingits best efforts to make available to the public means of communicationfor the public to respond quickly, and in the case of telephone comments,the comments have been recorded or transcribed as appropriate and the licenseehas been informed of the public comments. In circumstances where failure to act in a timely way would have resulted,for example, in derating or shutdown of a nuclear power plant or in preventionof either resumption of operation or of increase in power output up tothe plant's licensed power level, the Commission may not have had an opportunityto provide for public comment on its no significant hazards determination.In such case, the license amendment has been issued without opportunityfor comment. If there has been some time for public comment but less than30 days, the Commission may provide an opportunity for public comment.If comments have been requested, it is so stated. In either event, theState has been consulted by telephone whenever possible. Under its regulations, the Commission may issue and make an amendment immediatelyeffective, notwithstanding the pendency before it of a request for a hearingfrom any person, in advance of the holding and completion of any requiredhearing, where it has determined that no significant hazards considerationis involved. The Commission has applied the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 and has made afinal determination that the amendment involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The basis for this determination is contained in the documentsrelated to this action. Accordingly, the amendments have been issued andmade effective as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationfor amendment, (2) the amendment to Facility Operating License, and (3)the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or EnvironmentalAssessment, as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspectionat the Commission's Public Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW., Washington,DC, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved.A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. The Commission is also offering an opportunity for a hearing with respectto the issuance of the amendments. By June 17, 1988, the licensee may filea request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendment to thesubject facility operating license and any person whose interest may beaffected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a party inthe proceeding must file a written petition for leave to intervene. Requestsfor a hearing and petitions for leave to intervene shall be filed in accordancewith the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings''in 10 CFR Part 2. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to interveneis filed by the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard, designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safetyand Licensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition andthe Secretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board willissue a notice of hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceedingand how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. Since the Commission has made a final determination that the amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration, if a hearing is requested,it will not stay the effectiveness of the amendment. Any hearing held wouldtake place while the amendment is in effect. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, 1717 H Street, NW.,Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during thelast ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitionerpromptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to WesternUnion at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700). The Western Unionoperator should be given Datagram Identification Number 3737 and the followingmessage addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or theAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or request shouldbe granted based upon a balancing of the factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v)and 2.714(d). <ITAG tagnum="84">Washington Public Power Supply System Docket No. 50-397, WashingtonNuclear Project No. 2, Benton County, Washington </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>February 5, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised TechnicalSpecification 3/4.6.1.8, ``Drywell and Suppression Chamber Purge System,''to allow up to a total of 100 hours of purging in the current 365 daysperiod. Telephone authorization was granted on an emergency basis on February5 and confirmed by letter dated February 10, 1988. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 5, 1988 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 5, 1988 through April 9, 1988 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>56 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-21: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration:</T3>No. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, findingof emergency circumstances, consultation with the State of Washington,and final determination of no significant hazards consideration are containedin a Safety Evaluation dated May 5, 1988. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Nicholas Reynolds, Esq., Bishop, Cook,Purcell and Reynolds, 1400 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20005-3502 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Richland Public Library,Swift and Northgate Streets, Richland, Washington 99352. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 12th day of May, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Walter Butler, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Division of Reactor Projects-I/II, Office of NuclearReactor Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[Doc. 88-10977 Filed 5-17-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-D </ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>